Ham. Buzz, buzz!
Enter Rosencrantz.
Queen. Thanks, Guildenstern and gentle Rosencrantz.  
march. [Enter King, Queen, Polonius, Ophelia, Rosencrantz,
Did Hamlet so envenom with his envy
Costly thy habit as thy purse can buy,  
Farewell, and let your haste commend your duty.
Cor., Volt. In that, and all things, will we show our duty.
And we did think it writ down in our duty
As needful in our loves, fitting our duty?
discourse to your beauty.
Over the nasty sty!
Ham. How comes it? Do they grow rusty?
musty.
Oph. Could beauty, my lord, have better commerce than with honesty?
a thing to you from his Majesty.
Ham. Sir, I will walk here in the hall. If it please his Majesty,
To give th' assay of arms against your Majesty.
That live and feed upon your Majesty.
The lives of many. The cesse of majesty
Ham. No, faith, not a jot; but to follow him thither with modesty
That blurs the grace and blush of modesty;
Thy natural magic and dire property
That they may seem the taints of liberty,
To youth and liberty.
If you desire to know the certainty
As in their birth,- wherein they are not guilty,
For women's fear and love holds quantity,
[Sings] By Gis and by Saint Charity,  
That he is mad, 'tis true: 'tis true 'tis pity;
To his unmast'red importunity.
Passing through nature to eternity.  
From me, whose love was of that dignity
In neither aught, or in extremity.
gone, far gone! And truly in my youth I suff'red much extremity
And that in Hamlet's hearing, for a quality
Of violent birth, but poor validity;
tragedians of the city.
King. Hamlet, this deed, for thine especial safety,-
Than to entreaty.
And meant to wrack thee; but beshrew my jealousy!
For goodness, growing to a plurisy,
This bodiless creation ecstasy
Ham. Ecstasy?
Mar. Horatio says 'tis but our fantasy,
Is not this something more than fantasy?
To the next abstinence; the next more easy;
Ham. If thou dost marry, I'll give thee this plague for thy dowry:
With this regard their currents turn awry
there were no sallets in the lines to make the matter savoury,
A station like the herald Mercury
Of man and country-
And who in want a hollow friend doth try,
That does afflict our natures. I am sorry.
Ham. O God, your only jig-maker! What should a man do but be merry?
Pol. At 'closes in the consequence'- Ay, marry!
That are so fortified against our story,
Ham. Sir, a whole history.
Yea, from the table of my memory
And these few precepts in thy memory
Purpose is but the slave to memory,
He likewise gives a frock or livery,
And our vain blows malicious mockery.
I am justly kill'd with mine own treachery.
And borrowing dulls the edge of husbandry.
Well ratified by law and heraldry,
glean'd, it is but squeezing you and, sponge, you shall be dry
When in your motion you are hot and dry-  
Queen. How cheerfully on the false trail they cry!  
As England was his faithful tributary,
spectators to laugh too, though in the mean time some necessary
Guil. Happy in that we are not over-happy.
Meet what I would have well, and it destroy,
Their own enactures with themselves destroy.
[Sings] For bonny sweet Robin is all my joy.
The violence of either grief or joy
Whereon old Norway, overcome with joy,
Each opposite that blanks the face of joy
And there did seem in him a kind of joy
Have we, as 'twere with a defeated joy,
Clown. Why, here in Denmark. I have been sexton here, man and boy  
(Hey non nony, nony, hey nony)
Ham. Aha boy, say'st thou so? Art thou there, truepenny?
Ham. We shall obey, were she ten times our mother. Have you any
And hath abatements and delays as many  
Clown. Faith, if 'a be not rotten before 'a die (as we have many
heroes the beggars' shadows. Shall we to th' court? for, by my
I will win for him if I can; if not, I will gain nothing but my
willingly part withal- except my life, except my life, except my
I am very proud, revengeful, ambitious; with more offences at my
pluck out the heart of my mystery; you would sound me from my
feather. I have of late- but wherefore I know not- lost all my
Ham. No such matter! I will not sort you with the rest of my
Would not this, sir, and a forest of feathers- if the rest of my
His madness is poor Hamlet's enemy.
Directly seasons him his enemy.
That's not my meaning. But breathe his faults so quaintly
Been struck so to the soul that presently
Pol. And the Queen too, and that presently.
Pol. My lord, the Queen would speak with you, and presently.
Hor. Most constantly.
With this contagion, that, if I gall him slightly,
Guil. O my lord, if my duty be too bold, my love is too unmannerly.
Ham. No, believe me, 'tis very cold; the wind is northerly.
You do not understand yourself so clearly
Which are not sterling. Tender yourself more dearly,
appurtenance of welcome is fashion and ceremony. Let me comply
Most free in his reply.
King. Why, 'tis a loving and a fair reply.
Out of my weakness and my melancholy,
For good Polonius' death, and we have done but greenly
Clown. Is she to be buried in Christian burial when she wilfully
And for your rapier most especially,
tongue? You will do't, sir, really.
Ham. Come for the third, Laertes! You but dally.
Ham. I am sorry they offend you, heartily;
Yes, faith, heartily.
Though nothing sure, yet much unhappily.
Worse than the mutinies in the bilboes. Rashly-
argal, she drown'd herself wittingly.
Ham. What, look'd he frowningly.
waterfly?
On wholesome life usurp immediately.
Ros. Good my lord, what is your cause of distemper? You do surely
Th' oppressor's wrong, the proud man's contumely,
Ham. How strangely?
Subscrib'd it, gave't th' impression, plac'd it safely,
Ham. I embrace it freely,
humanity so abominably.
Ham. Why,
Ham. Why?
Ham. Why,
Than are dreamt of in your philosophy.
This warlike volley.
ancient gentlemen but gard'ners, ditchers, and grave-makers. They
[Laertes wounds Hamlet; then] in scuffling, they
Ham. What, are they children? Who maintains 'em? How are they
they?
Guil. But we both obey,
But not express'd in fancy; rich, not gaudy;
Why then, belike he likes it not, perdy.
Unto the voice and yielding of that body
With which she followed my poor father's body
And makes each petty artire in this body
All my smooth body.
Ham. The body is with the King, but the King is not with the body.
Go seek him out; speak fair, and bring the body
The natural gates and alleys of the body,
King. I have sent to seek him and to find the body.
Ros. What have you done, my lord, with the dead body?
Here was a gentleman of Normandy.
Pol. The best actors in the world, either for tragedy, comedy,
For if the King like not the comedy,
That, open'd, lies within our remedy.
Pro. For us, and for our tragedy,
King. How do you, pretty lady?
Ham. How is it with you, lady?
(Sings) He is dead and gone, lady,  
One word more, good lady.
make you ready.
the players ready.
Thou know'st already.
Mar. We have sworn, my lord, already.
Here, as before, never, so help you mercy,
To wash it white as snow? Whereto serves mercy
Ham. Well, God-a-mercy.
That he is open to incontinency.
Here stooping to your clemency,
so. Three of the carriages, in faith, are very dear to fancy,
That you do bend your eye on vacancy,
No, in despite of sense and secrecy,
With turbulent and dangerous lunacy?
The very cause of Hamlet's lunacy.
That, laps'd in time and passion, lets go by
Ham. I dare not drink yet, madam; by-and-by.
top of my bent.- I will come by-and-by.
the stair, into the lobby.
Here in the lobby.
Pol. Marry, I will teach you! Think yourself a baby
They bear the mandate; they must sweep my way
Say, Voltemand, what from our brother Norway?
Was, as you know, by Fortinbras of Norway,
Fortinbras, Prince of Norway.  
For bearers of this greeting to old Norway,  
Osr. Nothing neither way.
Ham. Do the boys carry it away?  
King. Give me some light! Away!
Ham. Why, look you there! Look how it steals away!  
Ber. See, it stalks away!
If Hamlet from himself be taken away,
Pol. Away, I do beseech you, both away
And at the sound it shrunk in haste away
Respeaking earthly thunder. Come away.
And hit the woundless air.- O, come away!
King. O Gertrude, come away!
Might stop a hole to keep the wind away.
Thus runs the world away.
Clown. Very strangely, they say.
gently; for in the very torrent, tempest, and (as I may say)
i' th' university, you say?
answer is I can make, you shall command; or rather, as you say,
Or then, or then, with such or such; and, as you say,
Art more engag'd! Help, angels! Make assay.  
Ber. Say-
O, say!
Pol. And then, sir, does 'a this- 'a does- What was I about to say?
say-
Look you, I'll go pray.
And still your fingers on your lips, I pray.
That you have ta'en these tenders for true pay,
Oph. Madam, I wish it may.
My soul is full of discord and dismay.
With all his crimes broad blown, as flush as May;
Till our scale turn the beam. O rose of May!
Let Hercules himself do what he may,
Pull'd the poor wretch from her melodious lay
And will this brother's wager frankly play.
Laer. Come, my lord.                                They play.
For they are actions that a man might play;
Ham. Madam, how like you this play?
Laertes before you fall to play.  
Prepare to play.
Laer. Say you so? Come on.                               Play.
But if you hold it fit, after the play
Pol. Give o'er the play.
King. What do you call the play?
Oph. You are naught, you are naught! I'll mark the play.
Oph. Belike this show imports the argument of the play.
The hart ungalled play;
That guilty creatures, sitting at a play,
That would not let me sleep. Methought I lay
The pangs of despis'd love, the law's delay,
Imperious Caesar, dead and turn'd to clay,
The changeling never known. Now, the next day  
The cat will mew, and dog will have his day.
(Sings) To-morrow is Saint Valentine's day,
I saw him yesterday, or t'other day,
No jocund health that Denmark drinks to-day
From the first corse till he that died to-day,
And it must follow, as the night the day,
And do such bitter business as the day
Doth make the night joint-labourer with the day?
How does your honour for this many a day?
translate beauty into his likeness. This was sometime a paradox,
That roars so loud and thunders in the index?
To flaming youth let virtue be as wax
That it went hand in hand even with the vow
Bears such an emphasis? whose phrase of sorrow
Or are you like the painting of a sorrow,
Ham. Follow him, friends. We'll hear a play to-morrow.
And if thou prate of mountains, let them throw
And in the cup an union shall he throw
Hazard so near us as doth hourly grow
Does by their own insinuation grow.
sing? Will they not say afterwards, if they should grow
See what a grace was seated on this brow;
And, with his other hand thus o'er his brow,
And lose the name of action.- Soft you now!
Laer. Have at you now!
Grows wide withal. Perhaps he loves you now,  
See you now-
Ham. If she should break it now!
His beard was as white as snow,
(Sings) White his shroud as the mountain snow-
I be so able as now.
Ham. What hour now?
How to forget that learning; but, sir, now  
Ham. What's the matter now?
Laer. My lord, I'll hit him now.
But how does it well? It does well to those that do ill. Now,
and then, you know,
Now what my love is, proof hath made you know;
It did me yeoman's service. Wilt thou know
Oph. My lord, I do not know,
And ever three parts coward,- I do not know
And prais'd be rashness for it; let us know,
Pol. Ay, springes to catch woodcocks! I do know,
But mad in craft. 'Twere good you let him know;
And tell you what I know.
King. Not that I know.
Let's do't, I pray; and I this morning know
How should I your true-love know
of question and are most tyrannically clapp'd fort. These are now
The Queen, the courtiers. Who is this they follow?
Therefore let's follow.
A rhapsody of words! Heaven's face doth glow;
King. [rises] My words fly up, my thoughts remain below.
The bold winds speechless, and the orb below
through the most fann'd and winnowed opinions; and do but blow
Not of that dye which their investments show,
But I have that within which passeth show-
And I a maid at your window,
it is but a shadow's shadow.
Ham. A dream itself is but a shadow.
Hor. 'Twere good she were spoken with; for she may strew
Finger'd their packet, and in fine withdrew
Ber. It was about to speak, when the cock crew.
High on a stage be placed to the view;
Thaw, and resolve itself into a dew!
know a hawk from a handsaw.
Will not debate the question of this straw.
But greatly to find quarrel in a straw
Dies not alone, but like a gulf doth draw  
Clown. Ay, marry, is't- crowner's quest law.
Other. But is this law?
Should patch a wall t' expel the winter's flaw!
Lost by his father, with all bands of law,
the end. He keeps them, like an ape, in the corner of his jaw;
Scene IV.
Scene IV.
Scene IV.
Scene V.
Scene V.
Queen. I shall obey you;
King. Who shall stay you?
Come. (They play.) Another hit. What say you?
Ros. [aside to Guildenstern] What say you?
Ham. Arm'd, say you?
Ham. How purpos'd, sir, I pray you?
Ham. I pray you.
King. Follow her close; give her good watch, I pray you.
You, as your business and desires shall point you,
I'll visit you.
Before my daughter told me), what might you,
Whereof he is the head. Then if he says he loves you,
have sent for you.
Servant. Seafaring men, sir. They say they have letters for you.
Sailor. 'A shall, sir, an't please him. There's a letter for you,
Oph. There's fennel for you, and columbines. There's rue for you,
my mother. Therefore no more, but to the matter! My mother, you  
So grace and mercy at your most need help you,
Ham. Speak the speech, I pray you, as I pronounc'd it to you,
King. Laertes, was your father dear to you?
This marvel to you.
May do t' express his love and friending to you,
hath sent me to you.
Clown. 'Tis a quick lie, sir; 'twill away again from me to you.
With all my love I do commend me to you;
Pol. What is't, Ophelia, he hath said to you?
What I have said to you.
for love- very near this. I'll speak to him again.- What do you
Good my lord, will you see the players well bestow'd? Do you
Both. We'll wait upon you.  
Ham. And fix'd his eyes upon you?
King. How is it that the clouds still hang on you?
The story is extant, and written in very choice Italian. You
But let me hear from you.
And that in way of caution- I must tell you
Pol. My lord, I have news to tell you.
It is an honest ghost, that let me tell you.
Is strict in his arrest) O, I could tell you-
Mark you,
Had it th' ability of life to thank you.
Ham. Beggar that I am, I am even poor in thanks; but I thank you;
And of all Christian souls, I pray God. God b' wi', you.
Your sudden coming o'er to play with you.
Queen. Alas, how is't with you,  
And now, Laertes, what's the news with you?
And he to England shall along with you.
Ham. Sir, my good friend- I'll change that name with you.
Guil. Good my lord, vouchsafe me a word with you.
Come, sir, to draw toward an end with you.
Ham. I do beseech you.
Hor. I beseech you.
given you one face, and you make yourselves another. You jig, you
Where you may see the inmost part of you.
King. He made confession of you;
my leave of you.
My too much changed son.- Go, some of you,
Queen. Good gentlemen, he hath much talk'd of you,
there, seek him i' th' other place yourself. But indeed, if you
Pol. Ophelia, walk you here.- Gracious, so please you,
To whom he more adheres. If it will please you
To let his madness range. Therefore prepare you;
Ham. Why, look you now, how unworthy a thing you make of me! You
Moreover that we much did long to see you,
Hor. It would have much amaz'd you.
Who hath reliev'd you?
inoculate our old stock but we shall relish of it. I loved you
So, proceed you.
'Thus didest thou.'
Ham. O Jephthah, judge of Israel, what a treasure hadst thou!
For husband shalt thou-
I'll rant as well as thou.
them. Let the King have the letters I have sent, and repair thou
it. Adieu.
I am dead, Horatio. Wretched queen, adieu!
Hor. Not when I saw't.
The kettledrum and trumpet thus bray out
Treachery! Seek it out.
philosophy could find it out.
By indirections find directions out.
Ham. My fate cries out
When churchyards yawn, and hell itself breathes out
Make you to ravel all this matter out,
And either [master] the devil, or throw him out
The trumpet to the cannoneer without,  
Laer. Where is this king?- Sirs, staid you all without.
That inward breaks, and shows no cause without
them to their trial-the bubbles are out,
And a most instant tetter bark'd about,  
That I distrust you. Yet, though I distrust,
Most lazar-like, with vile and loathsome crust
Discomfort you, my lord, it nothing must;
So to seduce!- won to his shameful lust
Seek for thy noble father in the dust.
Laer. A touch, a touch; I do confess't.
When second husband let me be accurst!
dungeons, Denmark being one o' th' worst.
Exeunt Polonius and Players [except the First].
None wed the second but who killed the first.
She married. O, most wicked speed, to post
servants; for, to speak to you like an honest man, I am most
Whose motive in this case should stir me most
Laer. And so have I a noble father lost;
As made the things more rich. Their perfume lost,
Exit Ghost.
Exit Ghost.
Exit Ghost.
Ham. Alas, poor ghost!
Enter Ghost.
Enter Ghost.
Ham. Ay, marry, is't;
The ocean, overpeering of his list,
To ears of flesh and blood. List, list, O, list!
This heavy-headed revel east and west
Give me one poor request.
That I have utt'red. Bring me to the test,
And flights of angels sing thee to thy rest!
Queen. O, confound the rest!
Ham. Ha, ha! Are you honest?
Ros. None, my lord, but that the world's grown honest.
And when you are desirous to be blest,
May violets spring! I tell thee, churlish priest,
A Priest.
the dead, not for the quick; therefore thou liest.
A couch for luxury and damned incest.
Laer. A Norman was't?
To serve in such a difference. What devil was't
All saws of books, all forms, all pressures past
By laboursome petition, and at last
will last you some eight year or nine year. A tanner will last
Ham. Well said, old mole! Canst work i' th' earth so fast?
Fell into a sadness, then into a fast,
Such love must needs be treason in my breast.
My news shall be the fruit to that great feast.
'The rugged Pyrrhus, like th' Hyrcanian beast-'
Ghost. Ay, that incestuous, that adulterate beast,
That you vouchsafe your rest here in our court
To hear of it. They are here about the court,
King. O, yet defend me, friends! I am but hurt.
As it is common for the younger sort
That she should lock herself from his resort,
When she saw Pyrrhus make malicious sport
And with a look so piteous in purport
And gave you such a masterly report
To make it truster of your own report
a chough; but, as I say, spacious in the possession of dirt.  
Lest with this piteous action you convert
Pol. My lord, I will use them according to their desert.
Guil. Good my lord, put your discourse into some frame, and start
Queen. More matter, with less art.
Such as it is; and for my own poor part,
Thy knotted and combined locks to part,
sequel at the heels of this mother's admiration? Impart.
Osr. Sweet lord, if your lordship were at leisure, I should impart
We'll teach you to drink deep ere you depart.
I hold it fit that we shake hands and part;
Or you deny me right. Go but apart,
But farewell it, for I will use no art.  
Had he been vanquisher, as, by the same comart
The harlot's cheek, beautied with plast'ring art,
Ham. Nay, but swear't.
It warms the very sickness in my heart
And shall I couple hell? Hold, hold, my heart!
If thou didst ever hold me in thy heart,
And I am sick at heart.
This something-settled matter in his heart,
There's tricks i' th' world, and hems, and beats her heart;
In my heart's core, ay, in my heart of heart,
The head is not more native to the heart,
A face without a heart,'
Ghost. I find thee apt;
'As by lot, God wot,'
Hor. So Guildenstern and Rosencrantz go to't.
Clown. To't.
as your daughter may conceive. Friend, look to't.
Young men will do't if they come to't
Ham. How long will a man lie i' th' earth ere he rot?
Go, bid the soldiers shoot.
Both. My lord, from head to foot.
With heraldry more dismal. Head to foot
I prithee, when thou seest that act afoot,
Ros. No indeed are they not.  
Ham. To what base uses we may return, Horatio! Why may not
Ham. Nay, I know not.
Hor. In what particular thought to work I know not;
Shall you my son. You have me, have you not
insert in't, could you not?
Ham. Let her not walk i' th' sun. Conception is a blessing, but not
continual practice. I shall win at the odds. But thou wouldst not
might it not?
Ghost. If thou hast nature in thee, bear it not.
Try what repentance can. What can it not?
Assume a virtue, if you have it not.
it not?
Ham. Nay, that follows not.
Looking before and after, gave us not
him and drown him, he drowns not himself. Argal, he that is not
Mark the encounter. If he love her not,
Oph. I hope all will be well. We must be patient; but I cannot
Ham. Sir, I cannot.
Osr. Exceedingly, my lord; it is very sultry, as 'twere- I cannot
Guil. Believe me, I cannot.
Guil. My lord, I cannot.
Ham. Very well. Follow that lord- and look you mock him not.
Ham. In heaven. Send thither to see. If your messenger find him not
Of all their conference. If she find him not,
Mess. Sailors, my lord, they say; I saw them not.
Both. My lord, we will not.
A brother's murther! Pray can I not,
To you in satisfaction; but if not,  
King. I have nothing with this answer, Hamlet. These words are not
Laer. O, fear me not!
not.
Ham. I would you did, sir; yet, in faith, if you did, it would not
Cries cuckold to my father; brands the harlot
Go to their graves like beds, fight for a plot
Osr. I thank your lordship, it is very hot.
That thou so many princes at a shot
epitaph is 'For O, for O, the hobby-horse is forgot!'
Laer. I will do't!
Fix'd on the summit of the highest mount,
No reckoning made, but sent to my account
Where we shall find him most conveniently.           Exeunt.
Madness in great ones must not unwatch'd go.         Exeunt.
To him from whom you brought them.                   Exeunt.
Exeunt.
Exeunt.
Exeunt.
Exeunt.
Exeunt.
Exeunt.
Exeunt.
Exeunt.
Exeunt
Exeunt.
Should have kept short, restrain'd, and out of haunt
I have sworn't.
What think you on't?
From fashion of himself. What think you on't?
It hath the primal eldest curse upon't,
Oph. Indeed, la, without an oath, I'll make an end on't!
on't.
Ham. I think it be thine indeed, for thou liest in't.
This is but scratch'd withal. I'll touch my point
That has no relish of salvation in't-
sweet, and by very much more handsome than fine. One speech in't
King. Have you heard the argument? Is there no offence in't?
Pol. [aside] Though this be madness, yet there is a method in't.-
Ham. Who is to be buried in't?
Will be some danger; which for to prevent,
Of thinking too precisely on th' event,-
Makes mouths at the invisible event,  
Was our sea-fight; and what to this was sequent
To give it due content.
Do I impart toward you. For your intent  
My stronger guilt defeats my strong intent,
Against the which a moiety competent
Upon his will I seal'd my hard consent.
very day that young Hamlet was born- he that is mad, and sent
Haply the seas, and countries different,
spent.
Yet what can it when one cannot repent?
Which is not tomb enough and continent
Contagious blastments are most imminent.
Ham. Why, man, they did make love to this employment!
This grave shall have a living monument.
Is not to stir without great argument,
And enterprises of great pith and moment
But do not dull thy palm with entertainment
Take each man's censure, but reserve thy judgment.
And waits upon the judgment; and what judgment
Divided from herself and her fair-judgment,
Ham. Judgment!
I am sorry that with better heed and judgment
I stand aloof, and will no reconcilement
Ham. Sir, I lack advancement.
Where joy most revels, grief doth most lament;
A heart unfortified, a mind impatient,
How in my words somever she be shent,
Up, sword, and know thou a more horrid hent.
Hor. [aside to Hamlet] I knew you must be edified by the margent
Ham. I prithee do not mock me, fellow student.
And call it accident.
Grief joys, joy grieves, on slender accident.
Th' associates tend, and everything is bent
And here give up ourselves, in the full bent,
Against yourself. I know you are no truant.
And I believe it is a fetch of warrant.
Osr. I know you are not ignorant-
Ham. Why, even in that was heaven ordinant.
And they can well on horseback; but this gallant  
Oph. Will he tell us what this show meant?
[Exit Attendant.]
Lords Attendant.
Queen, Laertes, with Lords attendant.]
Enter Horatio with an Attendant.
Of general assault.  
calumny. Get thee to a nunnery. Go, farewell. Or if thou wilt
So full of artless jealousy is guilt
Observe my uncle. If his occulted guilt
It spills itself in fearing to be spilt.
Ham. O that this too too solid flesh would melt,
O heat, dry up my brains! Tears seven times salt
King. I do not think't.
King. We will try it.
We beg your hearing patiently.                     [Exit.]
To give them seals never, my soul, consent!             Exit.
But that this folly douts it.                          Exit.
Give you good night.                                   Exit.
ladies. Good night, good night.                         Exit
This physic but prolongs thy sickly days.              Exit.
Capt. God b' wi' you, sir.                             [Exit.]
Pol. I will say so.                                      Exit.
they are. To a nunnery, go.                            Exit.
Words without thoughts never to heaven go.             Exit.
Howe'er my haps, my joys were ne'er begun.             Exit.
Laer. Farewell.                                          Exit.
My thoughts be bloody, or be nothing worth!            Exit.
Wherein I'll catch the conscience of the King.         Exit.
Adieu, adieu, adieu! Remember me.                      Exit.  
Exit.
Exit.
Exit.
Exit.
Exit.
It waves me forth again. I'll follow it.
Ham. It will not speak. Then will I follow it.
Therefore, since brevity is the soul of wit,
Hor. Heaven will direct it.
The hearers to collection; they aim at it,
Is not more ugly to the thing that helps it
And I beseech you instantly to visit
Then Hamlet does it not, Hamlet denies it.
Ham. Whose was it?
Thus much the business is: we have here writ
And am most sensibly in grief for it,
The potent poison quite o'ercrows my spirit.
Ghost. I am thy father's spirit,
Guil. The Queen, your mother, in most great affliction of spirit
Fort. Let us haste to hear it,  
But truly I do fear it.
Conscience and grace, to the profoundest pit!
Ham. Did you not speak to it?
He may approve our eyes and speak to it.
A table and flagons of wine on it.  
So mortal that, but dip a knife in it,
To pay five ducats, five, I would not farm it;
Hor. Good my lord, tell it.
bet against the Danish. Why is this all impon'd, as you call it?
Of Hamlet's transformation. So I call it,
Ham. No, you will reveal it.
Ham. I will prophesy he comes to tell me of the players. Mark it.-
Ham. How say you then? Would heart of man once think it?
Hor. It beckons you to go away with it,
But do not go with it!
Do you consent we shall acquaint him with it,
Osr. A hit, a very palpable hit.
If Hamlet give the first or second hit,
Than your particular demands will touch it.
And will not wrong it.
We would not understand what was most fit,
repair hither and say you are not fit.
Which is the mightier. In his lawless fit
And you yourself shall keep the key of it.
To let you know of it.
I chiefly lov'd. 'Twas AEneas' tale to Dido, and thereabout of it
Ham. O, throw away the worser part of it,
And draw you into madness? Think of it.
Time qualifies the spark and fire of it.
And, sister, as the winds give benefit
Hor. So have I heard and do in part believe it.
Ham. Do not believe it.
Hor. Never believe it.
It fits your wisdom so far to believe it
A kind of wick or snuff that will abate it;
So by his father lost; and this, I take it,
excellent voice, in this little organ, yet cannot you make it
Could force his soul so to his own conceit
very liberal conceit.
Ham. So be it!
imagination trace the noble dust of Alexander till he find it
Rey. My lord, I did intend it.
Ham. Yours, yours. [Exit Osric.] He does well to commend it
Ham. Why, then the Polack never will defend it.
sir, though I most powerfully and potently believe, yet I hold it
Termagant. It out-herods Herod. Pray you avoid it.
With the brave beast. So far he topp'd my thought
Is sicklied o'er with the pale cast of thought,
But in our circumstance and course of thought,
But answer made it none. Yet once methought
Indeed would make one think there might be thought,
Pol. Marry, well bethought!
I never gave you aught.
And, England, if my love thou hold'st at aught,-
Eyes without feeling, feeling without sight,
Fort. Where is this sight?
If you have hitherto conceal'd this sight,
And vanish'd from our sight.
Or look'd upon this love with idle sight?
That ever I was born to set it right!
King. It falls right.
Ham. Why, right! You are in the right!
Thou liv'st; report me and my cause aright  
Your skill shall, like a star i' th' darkest night,
With us to watch the minutes of this night,
Hor. My lord, I think I saw him yesternight.
And whatsoever else shall hap to-night,
That aptly is put on. Refrain to-night,
Mar. What, has this thing appear'd again to-night?
Ah, mine own lord, what have I seen to-night!
Ham. Never make known what you have seen to-night.
Let us impart what we have seen to-night
Ham. I will watch to-night.
Hold you the watch to-night?
Delay it not; I'll have him hence to-night.
Hor. What art thou that usurp'st this time of night
'Tis now the very witching time of night,
Doom'd for a certain term to walk the night,
In the dead vast and middle of the night
Fran. Give you good night.
The death I gave him. So again, good night.
Ber. Well, good night.
With wondrous potency. Once more, good night;
Sport and repose lock from me day and night,
Or 'If we list to speak,' or 'There be, an if they might,'
prais'd my Lord Such-a-one's horse when he meant to beg it- might
Queen. Nor earth to me give food, nor heaven light,
That lend a tyrannous and a damned light
By heaven, thy madness shall be paid by weight
From our achievements, though perform'd at height,
Other. I tell thee she is; therefore make her grave straight.
Ham. Haste me to know't, that I, with wings as swift
Pol. Marry, sir, here's my drift,
Here's yet some liquor left.
And scape detecting, I will pay the theft.
And therefore I forbid my tears; but yet
Pol. [aside] How say you by that? Still harping on my daughter. Yet
Pays homage to us,- thou mayst not coldly set
And with a sudden vigour it doth posset
Oph. My lord, as I was sewing in my closet,
Pol. My lord, he's going to his mother's closet.
The Queen's closet.
But you'll be secret?
King. Ay, Hamlet.
Queen. Why, how now, Hamlet?  
Flourish. Exeunt all but Hamlet.
[Exeunt all but Hamlet.]
Exeunt [all but Hamlet].
[Exeunt all but Hamlet.]  
Dar'd to the combat; in which our valiant Hamlet
Queen. Hamlet, Hamlet!
No more, sweet Hamlet!
Queen. Let not thy mother lose her prayers, Hamlet.
Ghost beckons Hamlet.
King. What, Gertrude? How does Hamlet?
Was't Hamlet wrong'd Laertes? Never Hamlet.
Enter Hamlet.
Enter Hamlet.
Enter Hamlet.
Enter Hamlet.
King. Thy loving father, Hamlet.
Speak to her, Hamlet.
Queen. No, no! the drink, the drink! O my dear Hamlet!
Getrude, Queen of Denmark, mother to Hamlet.
Horatio, friend to Hamlet.
King. How fares our cousin Hamlet?
King. Give them the foils, young Osric. Cousin Hamlet,
Flourish. [Enter Claudius, King of Denmark, Gertrude the Queen, Hamlet,
Mess. Letters, my lord, from Hamlet:
This gentle and unforc'd accord of Hamlet
King. 'Tis sweet and commendable in your nature, Hamlet,
The Queen carouses to thy fortune, Hamlet.
'He that thou knowest thine, HAMLET.'
Exchange forgiveness with me, noble Hamlet.
That I will speak to thee. I'll call thee Hamlet,
Gentlemen. (within) Hamlet! Lord Hamlet!
Than a command to parley. For Lord Hamlet,
Mar. Lord Hamlet!
I should be greeted, if not from Lord Hamlet.
As to give words or talk with the Lord Hamlet.
Oph. So please you, something touching the Lord Hamlet.  
How does my good Lord Hamlet?
Exeunt Ghost and Hamlet.
HAMLET.'
Enter Ghost and Hamlet.
'HAMLET.'
And put it in his pocket!  
Grating so harshly all his days of quiet
Hor. Good my lord, be quiet.
Most necessary 'tis that we forget
Methought it was very sweet;
And blow them at the moon. O, 'tis most sweet
counsel. Come, my coach! Good night, ladies. Good night, sweet
When in one line two crafts directly meet.  
For such a guest is meet.
For such a guest is meet.
(As I perchance hereafter shall think meet
O, methought there- a- was nothing- a- meet.
For and a shrouding sheet;
[Sits down at Ophelia's feet.]  
To lay our service freely at your feet,
As will not leave their tinct.
Must give us pause. There's the respect
Tears in his eyes, distraction in's aspect,
'Twere better not assay'd. Therefore this project
By letters congruing to that effect,
That we find out the cause of this effect-
The leperous distilment; whose effect
Or rather say, the cause of this defect,
Carrying, I say, the stamp of one defect,
Queen. Ay me, what act,
But, howsoever thou pursuest this act,
That are but mutes or audience to this act,
Nor any unproportion'd thought his act.
Gent. She is importunate, indeed distract.
Did slay this Fortinbras; who, by a seal'd compact,
Ham. What did you enact?
Ham. Such an act
At gaming, swearing, or about some act
Is thought-sick at the act.
Spurns enviously at straws; speaks things in doubt,
To pay ourselves what to ourselves is debt.
all welcome. We'll e'en to't like French falconers, fly at
Ham. Has this fellow no feeling of his business, that he sings at
Whips out his rapier, cries 'A rat, a rat!'
I prithee take thy fingers from my throat;
Tweaks me by th' nose? gives me the lie i' th' throat
Doth with his lofty and shrill-sounding throat
Oph. Pray let's have no words of this; but when they ask, you what
dreadfully attended. But in the beaten way of friendship, what
Ham. What?
needs marry, marry a fool; for wise men know well enough what
Ros. Believe what?
beauty of the world, the paragon of animals! And yet to me what
Ros. Truly, and I hold ambition of so airy and light a quality that
Ham. I must to England; you know that?
Pol. Hath there been such a time- I would fain know that-
I would know that.
tell how. But, my lord, his Majesty bade me signify to you that
(As I perceiv'd it, I must tell you that,
now? your gambols? your songs? your flashes of merriment that
Oph. Do you doubt that?
Laer. How now? What noise is that?
A villain kills my father; and for that,
And for my soul, what can it do to that,
Are most select and generous, chief in that.
Clown. E'en that.
Pol. [to the King] O, ho! do you mark that?
As may dishonour him- take heed of that;
knave jowls it to the ground,as if 'twere Cain's jawbone, that
How dost thou, good lord?' This might be my Lord Such-a-one, that
[Hamlet moves him to put on his hat.]
Give me the cup. Let go! By heaven, I'll ha't.
I ha't!
Had witchcraft in't. He grew unto his seat,
Ay, thou poor ghost, while memory holds a seat
But, in the verity of extolment, I take him to be a soul of great
Even for an eggshell. Rightly to be great
That monster, custom, who all sense doth eat
They are not near my conscience; their defeat
Ham. A man may fish with the worm that hath eat of a king, and eat
Lord, we know what we are, but know not what we may be. God be at
On Fortinbras; which he, in brief, obeys,
own grinning? Quite chap- fall'n? Now get you to my lady's
Look to't, I charge you. Come your ways.
reputation and profit, was better both ways.
As hell, whereto it goes. My mother stays.
and here's some for me. We may call it herb of grace o' Sundays.
And sets a blister there; makes marriage vows
That suck'd the honey of his music vows,
Convert his gives to graces; so that my arrows,
The cock crows.
Here, Hamlet, take my napkin, rub thy brows.  
Even here between the chaste unsmirched brows
Mar. Good now, sit down, and tell me he that knows,
This presence knows,
This was your husband. Look you now what follows.
Ham. There's letters seal'd; and my two schoolfellows,
How now? What news?
strumpet. What news ?
King. Thou still hast been the father of good news.
Hath op'd his ponderous and marble jaws
Pol. I did enact Julius Caesar; I was kill'd i' th' Capitol; Brutus
Of blue Olympus.
Over his kingdom. You know the rendezvous.
Be you content to lend your patience to us,
Whose image even but now appear'd to us,
Yet have I in me something dangerous,
question of the play be then to be considered. That's villanous
it make the unskilful laugh, cannot but make the judicious
Have of your audience been most free and bounteous.
When our deep plots do pall; and that should learn us
For your desire to know what is between us,
Enter Lucianus.
Speak of it! Stay, and speak!- Stop it, Marcellus!
Ber. Welcome, Horatio. Welcome, good Marcellus.
Enter Hamlet, Horatio, and Marcellus.
If you do meet Horatio and Marcellus,
Enter Horatio and Marcellus.  
Marcellus?
Enter Horatio and Marcellus.
Exit [Polonius].  
Exit [Polonius].
[Exit Polonius.]
King. Have you your father's leave? What says Polonius?
[Makes a pass through the arras and] kills Polonius.
King. Where is Polonius?
King. Now, Hamlet, where's Polonius?
[Lifts up the arras and sees Polonius.]
Enter Polonius.
Enter Polonius.  
Enter Polonius.
Enter Polonius.
Enter Polonius.
Reynaldo, servant to Polonius.
Ophelia, daughter to Polonius.
Laertes, son to Polonius.
Elsinore. A room in the house of Polonius.
Elsinore. A room in the house of Polonius.
Enter Queen and Polonius.
Exeunt King and Polonius].
Enter King and Polonius.
Polonius.
Polonius, Laertes and his sister Ophelia, [Voltemand, Cornelius,]
Exeunt Voltemand and Cornelius.
Enter Polonius, Voltemand, and Cornelius.
Thus it remains, and the remainder thus.
But you shall hear. Thus:
King. How long hath she been thus?
Whereon his brains still beating puts him thus
Whether aught to us unknown afflicts him thus
if that his Majesty would aught with us,
King. I like him not, nor stands it safe with us
further trade with us?
It could not move thus.  
What is the reason that you use me thus?
'Tis not so; it begins with Pyrrhus:
With eyes like carbuncles, the hellish Pyrrhus
Touching this dreaded sight, twice seen of us.
This unprevailing woe, and think of us
Might, by the sovereign power you have of us,
Leave us.
Both. We will haste us.
King. Bring him before us.
Ham. Angels and ministers of grace defend us!
clouts.
To give in evidence. What then? What rests?
Was falsely borne in hand, sends out arrests
That spirit upon whose weal depends and rests
question next, say 'a grave-maker.' The houses he makes lasts
Without the which we are Pictures or mere beasts;
Wherein they say you shine, Your sun of parts
seems harsh and unwilling awhile, but in the end accepts
And there I see such black and grained spots
Between the pass and fell incensed points
And even the like precurse of fierce events,
That, on the view and knowing of these contents,
Your bedded hairs, like life in excrements,
As there are tongues, are hands, are accidents;
Yet here she is allow'd her virgin crants,
tenants.
[Exeunt Attendants.]
Lords, ladies, Officers, Soldiers, Sailors, Messengers, Attendants.
King. Go seek him there. [To Attendants.]
Enter Hamlet and Guildenstern [with Attendants].
Exeunt King and Queen, [with Attendants].
Colours, and Attendants.
Attendants].
Even to the teeth and forehead of our faults,
Clown. Faith, e'en with losing his wits.
O heavens! is't possible a young maid's wits
But mere implorators of unholy suits,  
But look, amazement on thy mother sits.
As he is very potent with such spirits,
That no revenue hast but thy good spirits
shame and the odd hits.
Ros. My lord, there was no such stuff in my thoughts.  
Free me so far in your most generous thoughts  
remember. And there is pansies, that's for thoughts.
And botch the words up fit to their own thoughts;
Ham. That you must teach me. But let me conjure you by the rights
All. Lights, lights, lights!
But I do prophesy th' election lights  
And drive his purpose on to these delights.
With witchcraft of his wit, with traitorous gifts-
Attendants with foils and gauntlets.
[The King puts Laertes' hand into Hamlet's.]
Did squeak and gibber in the Roman streets;  
Bak'd and impasted with the parching streets,
With such dexterity to incestuous sheets!
Of carnal, bloody and unnatural acts;
Ham. Thrift, thrift, Horatio! The funeral bak'd meats
Why you proceeded not against these feats
Ham. Two thousand souls and twenty thousand ducats
Who calls me villain? breaks my pate across?
And wager on your heads. He, being remiss,
Each toy seems Prologue to some great amiss.
Becomes the field but here shows much amiss.
As one incapable of her own distress,
Upon our first, he sent out to suppress
Of this his nephew's purpose, to suppress
It lifted up it head and did address
Thence to a watch, thence into a weakness,
She turns to favour and to prettiness.
shall be the end of my business.
Answer, and think upon this business.
Hor. Custom hath made it in him a Property of easiness.
And that shall lend a kind of easiness
And makes as healthful music. It is not madness
Roughly awake, I here proclaim was madness.
That I essentially am not in madness,
And I the matter will reword; which madness
Mad call I it; for, to define true madness,
Queen. This is mere madness;
Without debatement further, more or less,
So tell him, with th' occurrents, more and less,
Ham. Then came each actor on his ass-
That it might please you to give quiet pass
Yea, this solidity and compound mass,
You go not till I set you up a glass
Clown. You lie out on't, sir, and therefore 'tis not yours.
Oph. My lord, I have remembrances of yours
The portraiture of his. I'll court his favours.
favours?
To both your honours.
Our crown, our life, and all that we call ours,
within 's two hours.
Enter Sailors.
Most welcome home!                       Exeunt Ambassadors.
Pol. Give first admittance to th' ambassadors.
English Ambassadors.
Pol. Come, sirs.
Till the last trumpet. For charitable prayers,
Exeunt Players.
Ros. Madam, it so fell out that certain players
Enter four or five Players.
With most miraculous organ, I'll have these Players
Flourish for the Players.
Enter Hamlet and three of the Players.
Guil. There are the players.
Players.
He answers:
Laer. I thank you. Keep the door.      [Exeunt his Followers.]
Larded all with sweet flowers;
[Scatters flowers.]
With true-love showers.
Come, I will give you way for these your letters,
Enter a Messenger with letters.
Ham. Do you think I meant country matters?
But keep a farm and carters.
Hautboys play. The dumb show enters.
Of accidental judgments, casual slaughters;
Thick and and unwholesome in their thoughts and whispers
Ham. And do still, by these pickers and stealers!
Do not believe his vows; for they are brokers,
And his commission to employ those soldiers,
As you are friends, scholars, and soldiers,
The counterfeit presentment of two brothers.
Ham. I lov'd Ophelia. Forty thousand brothers
Enter Laertes with others.
Enter Hamlet, Rosencrantz, [Guildenstern,] and others.
souls, it touches us not. Let the gall'd jade winch; our withers
Or paddling in your neck with his damn'd fingers,
Osr. The carriages, sir, are the hangers.
Two Clowns, gravediggers.
Enter the Players with recorders.  
Ham.   Aha! Come, some music! Come, the recorders!
Oph. He hath, my lord, of late made many tenders
That was and is the question of these wars.
thirty years.
you i' th' earth three-and-twenty years.
equivocation will undo us. By the Lord, Horatio, this three years
The light and careless livery that it wears
Ere yet the salt of most unrighteous tears
That I have? He would drown the stage with tears
Pours the poison in his ears.
And let us once again assail your ears,
Who, impotent and bedrid, scarcely hears
Gent. She speaks much of her father; says she hears
These words like daggers enter in mine ears.
The very faculties of eyes and ears.
In Denmark's crown have worn. Give me the cups;
discourse most eloquent music. Look you, these are the stops.
But, sir, such wanton, wild, and usual slips
But age with his stealing steps
[He] sleeps.
T' assume a pleasing shape; yea, and perhaps
the doctor; for me to put him to his purgation would perhaps
Ham. O, reform it altogether! And let those that play your clowns
The insolence of office, and the spurns
With blood of fathers, mothers, daughters, sons,
The fair Ophelia!- Nymph, in thy orisons
King. O, for two special reasons,
Larded with many several sorts of reasons,
[Ghost beckons.]  
They have proclaim'd their malefactions;
Is the main motive of our preparations,
Makes us traduc'd and tax'd of other nations;
Elsinore. The Castle. Another part of the fortifications.
To cast beyond ourselves in our opinions
Pol. Look, whe'r he has not turn'd his colour, and has tears in's
About her lank and all o'erteemed loins,
Ham. Is not parchment made of sheepskins?
Fort. Let four captains
Or I could make a prologue to my brains,
Guil. O, there has been much throwing about of brains.
Mad let us grant him then. And now remains
Or by some habit that too much o'erleavens
Oph. O, help him, you sweet heavens!
Is there not rain enough in the sweet heavens
Admit no messengers, receive no tokens.
show, he'll not shame to tell you what it means.
themselves to common players (as it is most like, if their means
Hor. No, by no means!
As checking at his voyage, and that he means
Sith I have cause, and will, and strength, and means
Weigh what convenience both of time and means
A sister driven into desp'rate terms,
Laer. To his good friends thus wide I'll ope my arms
Spreads his arms.
Clown. 'A was the first that ever bore arms.
Till I have caught her once more in mine arms.
'The rugged Pyrrhus, he whose sable arms,
Ham. Seems, madam, Nay, it is. I know not 'seems.'
king of infinite space, were it not that I have bad dreams.
With thoughts beyond the reaches of our souls?
As to peace-parted souls.
Ham. These tedious old fools!
And in this brainish apprehension kills
of the peasant comes so near the heel of the courtier he galls
Are mortis'd and adjoin'd; which when it falls,
Rebellious to his arm, lies where it falls,
[Laertes falls.]
Ham. Nay come! again!                         The Queen falls.  
Keeps wassail, and the swagg'ring upspring reels,
All may be well.                                  He kneels.
Her father and myself (lawful espials)
Conceit in weakest bodies strongest works.
Before mine uncle. I'll observe his looks;
Queen. I will, my lord; I pray you pardon me.          Drinks.
Queen. The lady doth protest too much, methinks.
With this affair along. For all, our thanks.
Where should We have our thanks?
Your visitation shall receive such thanks
Old grandsire Priam seeks.'
As from the body of contraction plucks  
The heartache, and the thousand natural shocks
That I, in forgery of shapes and tricks,
Rhenish on my head once. This same skull, sir, was Yorick's
That not your trespass but my madness speaks.
What majesty should be, what duty is,
comes in again, seem to condole with her. The dead body is
Alexander was buried, Alexander returneth into dust; the dust is
lord of beasts, and his crib shall stand at the king's mess. 'Tis
your name be Horatio, as I am let to know it is.
Ghost. Murther most foul, as in the best it is;
Most holy and religious fear it is
man; good. If the man go to this water and drown himself, it is,
And what so poor a man as Hamlet is
And bring these gentlemen where Hamlet is.
Osr. You are not ignorant of what excellence Laertes is-
Enquire me first what Danskers are in Paris;
Flourish. [Enter King and Queen, Rosencrantz and Guildenstern, cum aliis.
King. What dost thou mean by this?  
Ham. I humbly thank you, sir. [Aside to Horatio] Dost know this
it means, say you this:
Laer. Why ask you this?
To tell us this.
King. Do you think 'tis this?
Hor. Why, what a king is this!
Queen. Alack, what noise is this?
What warlike noise is this?
Queen. O, what a rash and bloody deed is this!
Ham. But where was this?
Take up the bodies. Such a sight as this
So excellent a king, that was to this
chamber, and tell her, let her paint an inch thick, to this
Possess it merely. That it should come to this!
Pol. Wherefore should you do this?
Ham. Look here upon th's picture, and on this,
Of habits evil, is angel yet in this,
Into the chapel. I pray you haste in this.
Your loneliness.- We are oft to blame in this,
Ham. This?
Queen. To whom do you speak this?
Now, out of this-
King. Let's further think of this,
And let us hear Bernardo speak of this.
Pol. [points to his head and shoulder] Take this from this, if this
To make oppression bitter, or ere this
In ear and ear. O my dear Gertrude, this,
not mend his pace with beating; and when you are ask'd this
great buyer of land, with his statutes, his recognizances, his
Ham. God's bodykins, man, much better! Use every man after his
If you oppos'd them. Sir, this report of his  
him asleep, leaves him. Anon comes in a fellow, takes off his
scorn her own image, and the very age and body of the time his
how the wheel becomes it! It is the false steward, that stole his
[Aside] To my sick soul (as sin's true nature is)
Ros. Nay, their endeavour keeps in the wonted pace; but there is,
Osr. Nay, good my lord; for mine ease, in good faith. Sir, here is
Pol. You go to seek the Lord Hamlet. There he is.
Ham. My mother! Father and mother is man and wife; man and wife is
well.- Welcome, good friends.- O, my old friend? Why, thy face is
O, this is counter, you false Danish dogs!
If with too credent ear you list his songs,
Save me and hover o'er me with your wings,
And more above, hath his solicitings,
Clown. (Sings)
Clown. (sings)
Oph. (sings)
Oph. (sings)
Oph. (sings)
Oph. (Sings)
[Clown digs and] sings.
O, this is the poison of deep grief; it springs
We'll make a solemn wager on your cunnings-
Of your precedent lord; a vice of kings;
Richer than that which four successive kings
And leads the will to desperate undertakings
To whose huge spokes ten thousand lesser things
Ham. That's a fair thought to lie between maids' legs.
kingdom. To-morrow shall I beg leave to see your kingly eyes;
Blasting his wholesome brother. Have you eyes?  
And batten on this moor? Ha! have you eyes
Though all the earth o'erwhelm them, to men's eyes.
He seem'd to find his way without his eyes,
Who like not in their judgment, but their eyes;
have grey beards; that their faces are wrinkled; their eyes
Of mine own eyes.  
By their oppress'd and fear-surprised eyes,
Had left the flushing in her galled eyes,
In thews and bulk; but as this temple waxes,
Enter two Clowns, [with spades and pickaxes].
After the thing it loves.
Queen. No, nothing but ourselves.
Together with remembrance of ourselves.
should have count'nance in this world to drown or hang themselves
To the ambassadors of England gives
alone became their prisoner. They have dealt with me like thieves
Into the madness wherein now he raves,
the readiness is all. Since no man knows aught of what he leaves,
King. There's matter in these sighs. These profound heaves
Of Hamlet's wildness. So shall I hope your virtues
passionate action. The Poisoner with some three or four Mutes,
Shark'd up a list of lawless resolutes,
Osr. How is't, Laertes?
You told us of some suit. What is't, Laertes?
Ham. That is Laertes,
change rapiers, [and Hamlet wounds Laertes].
Hamlet the Dane.                    [Leaps in after Laertes.
King. If it be so, Laertes
And when he's not himself does wrong Laertes,
And lose your voice. What wouldst thou beg, Laertes,
Osr. Of Laertes?
What wouldst thou have, Laertes?
King. What is the cause, Laertes,
Acts little of his will. Tell me, Laertes,
Queen. Calmly, good Laertes.
Revenge should have no bounds. But, good Laertes,
King. Good Laertes,
So fast they follow. Your sister's drown'd, Laertes.
Enter King and Laertes.
King. O, he is mad, Laertes.
and many more of the same bevy that I know the drossy age dotes
Of mighty opposites.
At least I am sure it may be so in Denmark.        [Writes.]
My tongue and soul in this be hypocrites-
I should have fatted all the region kites
As harbingers preceding still the fates
And let him, for a pair of reechy kisses,
Osr. The King, sir, hath wager'd with him six Barbary horses;
King. So is it, if thou knew'st our purposes.
Oph. The King rises.
strutted and bellowed that I have thought some of Nature's
Where be his quiddits now, his quillets, his cases, his tenures,
Volt. Most fair return of greetings and desires.
And for the day confin'd to fast in fires,
Make thy two eyes, like stars, start from their spheres,
Ham. On him, on him! Look you how pale he glares!
Popp'd in between th' election and my hopes;
Then up he rose and donn'd his clo'es
Which time she chaunted snatches of old tunes,
His form and cause conjoin'd, preaching to stones,
If thou canst mutine in a matron's bones,
No trophy, sword, nor hatchment o'er his bones,
But I will delve one yard below their mines
the top of mine) an excellent play, well digested in the scenes,
where my abridgment comes.
Hor. Look, my lord, it comes!
I stay too long. But here my father comes.
Some say that ever, 'gainst that season comes
'Tis dangerous when the baser nature comes
Yet needfull too; for youth no less becomes
For in the fatness of these pursy times
Pol. Indeed, that is out o' th' air. [Aside] How pregnant sometimes
Having ever seen in the prenominate crimes
When I to sulph'rous and tormenting flames
1. Play. 'Run barefoot up and down, threat'ning the flames
Of crowflowers, nettles, daisies, and long purples,
Or to take arms against a sea of troubles,
Did coldly furnish forth the marriage tables.
Virtue itself scopes not calumnious strokes.
That patient merit of th' unworthy takes,
Soil our addition; and indeed it takes
The very soul, and sweet religion makes
leaves him. The Queen returns, finds the King dead, and makes
His further gait herein, in that the levies,
And he beseech'd me to entreat your Majesties
Ros. Both your Majesties
there is a kind of confession in your looks, which your modesties
And stand a comma 'tween their amities,
When sorrows come, they come not single spies.
Some little time; so by your companies
Ham. Being thus benetted round with villanies,
Laer. None but his enemies.
The poor advanc'd makes friends of enemies;
There is no shuffling; there the action lies
The great man down, you mark his favourite flies,
Clown. It must be se offendendo; it cannot be else. For here lies
Th' extravagant and erring spirit hies
Are here arriv'd, give order that these bodies
Follow my mother.                                 King dies.
Nor thine on me!                                       Dies.
Which have solicited- the rest is silence.             Dies.
The drink, the drink! I am poison'd.                 [Dies.]
Out of his lunacies.
And tediousness the limbs and outward flourishes,
Ham. A king of shreds and patches!-
carrying torches.
We should do when we would; for this 'would' changes,
For like the hectic in my blood he rages,
Ham. What call you the carriages?
Guil. Heavens make our presence and our practices
Like to a murd'ring piece, in many places  
lips that I have kiss'd I know not how oft. Where be your gibes
Breathing like sanctified and pious bawds,
Feeds on his wonder, keep, himself in clouds,
Caps, hands, and tongues applaud it to the clouds,
Ham. Words, words, words.
More than in words?
Must (like a whore) unpack my heart with words
to me with as much speed as thou wouldst fly death. I have words
Enter King, Queen, Polonius, Ophelia, Rosencrantz, Guildenstern, and Lords.
I'll wipe away all trivial fond records,
Ham. Ay, sir; that soaks up the King's countenance, his rewards,  
A man that Fortune's buffets and rewards
Out, out, thou strumpet Fortune! All you gods,  
And passion in the gods.'
Abuses me to damn me. I'll have grounds
Dangerous conjectures in ill-breeding minds.
There's a divinity that shapes our ends,
Carve for himself, for on his choice depends
Come, Gertrude, we'll call up our wisest friends
As thus, 'I know his father and his friends,
Ham. 'By-and-by' is easily said.- Leave me, friends.
question more in particular. What have you, my good friends,
Welcome, my good friends.
O'ermaster't as you may. And now, good friends,  
A worthy pioner! Once more remove, good friends."
As low as to the fiends!
Upon whose influence Neptune's empire stands
Ros. Niggard of question, but of our demands
Did forfeit, with his life, all those his lands
Importing the surrender of those lands
And terms compulsatory, those foresaid lands
Ham. Hold off your hands!
Since love our hearts, and Hymen did our hands,
Unite comutual in most sacred bands.
It is our trick; nature her custom holds,
Do not for ever with thy vailed lids
There on the pendant boughs her coronet weeds
Thin settled age his sables and his weeds,
And do not spread the compost on the weeds
But since he is better'd, we have therefore odds.
Himself the primrose path of dalliance treads
Pol. Good madam, stay awhile. I will be faithful.     [Reads.]  
[Reads.]
In Mincing with his sword her husband's limbs,
Clown. A whoreson, mad fellow's it was. Whose do you think it was?
'It came to pass, as most like it was.'
This realm dismantled was  
[Polonius hides behind the arras.]
Capt. The nephew to old Norway, Fortinbras.
Now follows, that you know, young Fortinbras,
His fell to Hamlet. Now, sir, young Fortinbras,
To Norway, uncle of young Fortinbras,
To the inheritance of Fortinbras,
Tell him that by his license Fortinbras
last king Hamlet overcame Fortinbras.
married already- all but one- shall live; the rest shall keep as
King. Alas, alas!
With windlasses and with assays of bias,
Ham. It is but foolery; but it is such a kind of gaingiving as
affectation; but call'd it an honest method, as wholesome as
whose end, both at the first and now, was and is, to hold, as
Clown. 'Twill not he seen in him there. There the men are as mad as
Denmark?- What, my young lady and mistress? By'r Lady, your
Ham. I will receive it, sir, with all diligence of spirit. Put your
Ham. I will tell you why. So shall my anticipation prevent your
convocation of politic worms are e'en at him. Your worm is your
believe none of us. Go thy ways to a nunnery. Where's your
Ros. Why, then your ambition makes it one. 'Tis too narrow for your
[Reads]'High and Mighty,-You shall know I am set naked on your
were wont to set the table on a roar? Not one now, to mock your
Ham. It is as easy as lying. Govern these ventages with your
amble, and you lisp; you nickname God's creatures and make your  
Ham. Be not too tame neither; but let your own discretion be your
Laer. For Hamlet, and the trifling of his favour,
Clown. Of all the days i' th' year, I came to't that day that our
And in the porches of my ears did pour
Pol. Upon my honour-
Player. I warrant your honour.
All. Our duty to your honour.  
As it behooves my daughter and your honour.
Till by some elder masters of known honour
To my revenge. But in my terms of honour
That show of such an exercise may colour
Of his behaviour.
And since so neighbour'd to his youth and haviour,
Fran. You come most carefully upon your hour.
Mar. Thus twice before, and jump at this dead hour,
trippingly on the tongue. But if you mouth it, as many of our
Meantime we thank you for your well-took labour.
Is apoplex'd; for madness would not err,
liquor.
Pol. That did I, my lord, and was accounted a good actor.
Which he stood seiz'd of, to the conqueror;
Upon a wretch whose natural gifts were poor  
And dupp'd the chamber door,
King. Where are my Switzers? Let them guard the door.
individable, or poem unlimited. Seneca cannot be too heavy, nor
Mother, good night.- Indeed, this counsellor
Next, Your son gone, and he most violent author
Guil. My lord, we were sent for.
Ham. What man dost thou dig it for?
That thus he suffers for.
Ham. Thou dost lie in't, to be in't and say it is thine. 'Tis for
of mercy; but they knew what they did: I am to do a good turn for
And all we mourn for.  
Ham. How absolute the knave is! We must speak by the card, or
Behind the arras hearing something stir,
Capt. They are of Norway, sir.
God bless you, sir!
Sailor. God bless you, sir.
Ham. Hear you, sir!
Pol. Marry, well said, very well said. Look you, sir,
Why the man dies.- I humbly thank you, sir.
Ros. [to Polonius] God save you, sir!
Player. I hope we have reform'd that indifferently with us, sir.
shoes, get me a fellowship in a cry of players, sir?
Osr. Sir?
Ham. Come on, sir.
Ham. I am very glad to see you.- [To Bernardo] Good even, sir.-  
Clown. For no man, sir.
Ham. Of him, sir.
Ham. Who commands them, sir?
much approve me. Well, sir?  
Ham. With drink, sir?
Guil. The King, sir-
not honesty to have it thus set down; for you yourself, sir,
Clown. Mine, sir.
Laer. You mock me, sir.
Ham. Goes it against the main of Poland, sir,
But on! Six Barbary horses against six French swords, their
Hor. If your mind dislike anything, obey it. I will forestall their
Whether in sea or fire, in earth or air,
Hor. It is a nipping and an eager air.
But soft! methinks I scent the morning air.
Ham. Are you fair?
Devis'd a new commission; wrote it fair.
not so wildly from my affair.
Ham. Excellent, i' faith; of the chameleon's dish. I eat the air,
Ham. There's another. Why may not that be the skull of a lawyer?
My fault is past. But, O, what form of prayer
[Exit First Player.]
while, no money bid for argument unless the poet and the player
Mar. 'Tis gone and will not answer.
if your lordship would vouchsafe the answer.
In general synod take away her power;
Giving to you no further personal power
May be a devil; and the devil hath power
O wicked wit and gifts, that have the power
Other. Nay, but hear you, Goodman Delver!
Truly deliver.
With an attent ear, till I may deliver
That I have longed long to re-deliver.
O heart, lose not thy nature; let not ever
Hor. The same, my lord, and your poor servant ever.
To do obsequious sorrow. But to persever  
[Reads] the letter.
think how ill all's here about my heart. But it is no matter.
I lov'd you ever. But it is no matter.
Laer. This nothing's more than matter.
Ham. Now, mother, what's the matter?
How now, Ophelia? What's the matter?
What is the matter?
he has laid a great wager on your head. Sir, this is the matter-
To hear and see the matter.
And, like a neutral to his will and matter,
Ham. Nay, do not think I flatter;
Fear it, Ophelia, fear it, my dear sister,
That I must be their scourge and minister.
skull, the King's jester.
on, only got the tune of the time and outward habit of encounter-
carpenter?
shipwright, or the carpenter?
Pol. [aside] Still on my daughter.
master's daughter.
Oph. Well, God dild you! They say the owl was a baker's daughter.  
Lends the tongue vows. These blazes, daughter,
kissing carrion- Have you a daughter?
Ham. Of nothing. Bring me to him. Hide fox, and all after.
Whose whisper o'er the world's diameter,
Winner and loser?
That they do know my son, come you more nearer
Ham. Hark you, Guildenstern- and you too- at each ear a hearer!
Ham. At supper.
Upon the beat and flame of thy distemper
The head and source of all your son's distemper.
Of these dilated articles allow.            [Gives a paper.]
[Gives a paper.]
And pious action we do sugar o'er  
For 'tis the sport to have the enginer
Guil. No, my lord; rather with choler.
plunge him into far more choler.
his kibe.- How long hast thou been a grave-maker?
Rosencrantz, courtier.
Cornelius, courtier.
Guildenstern, courtier.
A Gentleman, courtier.
Voltemand, courtier.
Osric, courtier.
Enter young Osric, a courtier.
Or for some frontier?
Ham. 'Tis e'en so. The hand of little employment hath the daintier
Mar. O, farewell, honest soldier.
Francisco, a soldier
They bore him barefac'd on the bier
Ham. Murther?
Can serve my turn? 'Forgive me my foul murther'?
Ghost. Revenge his foul and most unnatural murther.
Of those effects for which I did the murther-
King. How may we try it further?
May give his saying deed; which is no further
Ham. Whither wilt thou lead me? Speak! I'll go no further.
And hurt my brother.
As watchman to my heart. But, good my brother,
As kill a king, and marry with his brother.  
That hath a stomach in't; which is no other,
Hor [aside to Hamlet] Is't not possible to understand in another
Ham. Why he more than another?
Laer. This is too heavy; let me see another.
Would quake to look on. Soft! now to my mother!
Hyperion to a satyr; so loving to my mother
And (would it were not so!) you are my mother.
He that hath kill'd my king, and whor'd my mother;
Good night, mother.
But yet to me they are strong. The Queen his mother
Ham. (within) Mother, mother, mother!
Farewell, dear mother.
Of my true mother.
'Tis not alone my inky cloak, good mother,
Ham. A bloody deed- almost as bad, good mother,
'Tis meet that some more audience than a mother,  
Enter King, Queen, Laertes, Osric, and Lords, with other
Folded the writ up in the form of th' other,
Pale as his shirt, his knees knocking each other,
Ham. So much for this, sir; now shall you see the other.
hither?
dare scarce come thither.
For we have closely sent for Hamlet hither,
Why does the drum come hither?
Clown. For none neither.
Go to your rest; at night we'll feast together.
Pol. You know sometimes he walks four hours together
Nay, come, let's go together.  
God willing, shall not lack. Let us go in together;
The Frenchman gave you; bring you in fine together
To draw him on to pleasures, and to gather
Laer. Where is my father?
Most throughly for my father.
would give you some violets, but they wither'd all when my father
Ham. The King my father?
Play something like the murther of my father
Give me my father!
My father's brother, but no more like my father
My father- methinks I see my father.
Than is the throne of Denmark to thy father.
Ghost of Hamlet's Father.
The apparition comes. I knew your father.
Requite him for your father.  
To give these mourning duties to your father;
Hor. My lord, the King your father.
King. Not that I think you did not love your father;
Been thus encount'red. A figure like your father,
King. Conceit upon her father.
entertainment than yours. You are welcome. But my uncle-father
But you must know, your father lost a father;
father?
Make up my sum. What wilt thou do for her?
To sing a requiem and such rest to her
Queen. Came this from Hamlet to her?
unto him. He takes her up, and declines his head upon her
Shards, flints, and pebbles should be thrown on her.
Queen. I will not speak with her.
Ham. Then you live about her waist, or in the middle of her
This must not be.' And then I prescripts gave her,
Ham. Excellent well. You are a fishmonger.
Both. Longer, longer.
That they are not a pipe for Fortune's finger
Exit Messenger.
Enter a Messenger.
Hor. A countenance more in sorrow than in anger.
That we can let our beard be shook with danger,
Thou find'st to be too busy is some danger.
Osr. Rapier and dagger.
You know the wager?
Whether 'tis nobler in the mind to suffer
And, as I think, they have already order
And, but that great command o'ersways the order,
King. Pluck thein asunder.
As hush as death- anon the dreadful thunder
Hor. Most like. It harrows me with fear and wonder.
And what's untimely done. [So haply slander-]
That hurts by easing. But to the quick o' th' ulcer!
Marcellus, officer.
Marcellus, Officer.
Bernardo, officer.
Ham. I beseech you remember.
Will you do this? Keep close within your chamber.
And foreign mart for implements of war;
The soldiers' music and the rites of war
'Lord Hamlet is a prince, out of thy star.
Disasters in the sun; and the moist star
Being nature's livery, or fortune's star,
Doubt truth to be a liar;
Be thou familiar, but by no means vulgar:
we fat ourselves for maggots. Your fat king and your lean beggar
the guts of a beggar.
he knew me not at first. He said I was a fishmonger. He is far
Drabbing. You may go so far.
you nine year.
[They swear.]
Ghost. Swear.
Consent to swear.
Ghost. [beneath] Swear.
Swear.
Ghost. [beneath] Swear.
As peace should still her wheaten garland wear
And in his grave rain'd many a tear.
And wants not buzzers to infect his ear
Hor. Tush, tush, 'twill not appear.
Youth to itself rebels, though none else near.
The glowworm shows the matin to be near
How these things came about. So shall You hear
Where thrift may follow fawning. Dost thou hear?
Ghost. So art thou to revenge, when thou shalt hear.
Wouldst thou not stir in this. Now, Hamlet, hear.
Ham. I am glad of it. A knavish speech sleeps in a foolish ear.
Since nature makes them partial, should o'erhear
King. O, speak of that! That do I long to hear.
Ham. Speak. I am bound to hear.
Ham. Nor did you nothing hear?
Ham. For God's love let me hear!
Sith you have heard, and with a knowing ear,
The virtue of his will; but you must fear,
For we will fetters put upon this fear,
Be wary then; best safety lies in fear.
Almost to jelly with the act of fear,
Where love is great, the littlest doubts are fear;
Ham. Why, what should be the fear?
All given to mine ear.
And I'll be plac'd so please you, in the ear
Here is your husband, like a mildew'd ear
For thou dost know, O Damon dear,
With a bare bodkin? Who would these fardels bear,
A blanket, in the alarm of fear caught up-  
Hor. O, yes, my lord! He wore his beaver up.
And, mermaid-like, awhile they bore her up;
find him not within this month, you shall nose him as you go up
Or pardon'd being down? Then I'll look up;
You mainly were stirr'd up.
Give him the cup.
Unpeg the basket on the house's top,
Seeming to feel this blow, with flaming top
sir, an eyrie of children, little eyases, that cry out on the top
No, let the candied tongue lick absurd pomp,
The bark is ready and the wind at help,
For out o' doors he went without their help
Pol. [behind] What, ho! help, help, help!
Oph. What means your lordship?
Osr. I commend my duty to your lordship.
Hor. Hail to your lordship!
Ham.   Why, let the strucken deer go weep,
To try conclusions, in the basket creep
Forth at your eyes your spirits wildly peep;
For some must watch, while some must sleep:
And convoy is assistant, do not sleep,
And by opposing end them. To die- to sleep-
Devoutly to be wish'd. To die- to sleep.
The tedious day with sleep.
And how, and who, what means, and where they keep,
Oph. I shall th' effect of this good lesson keep
Ham. I mean, my head upon your lap?
Ham. Lady, shall I lie in your lap?
Both. We will, my lord.                       Exeunt they two.
Ham. Bid the players make haste, [Exit Polonius.] Will you two
But two months dead! Nay, not so much, not two.
'O dear Ophelia, I am ill at these numbers; I have not art to
have seen play, and heard others praise, and that highly (not to
Lord. The Queen desires you to use some gentle entertainment to
Ros. My lord, you must tell us where the body is and go with us to
Ham. Your wisdom should show itself more richer to signify this to
bar the door upon your own liberty, if you deny your griefs to
brings back to him, that you attend him in the hall. He sends to
Other. Go to!
Pol. Ay, fashion you may call it. Go to, go to!
soul to hear a robustious periwig-pated fellow tear a passion to
Ros. Then thus she says: your behaviour hath struck her into
will he nill he, he goes- mark you that. But if the water come to
He's for a jig or a tale of bawdry, or he sleeps. Say on; come to
My good friends, I'll leave you till night. You are welcome to
Ber. It would be spoke to.
Ham. Ay, or any show that you'll show him. Be not you asham'd to
Ham. I would not hear your enemy say so,
neither, though by your smiling you seem to say so.
And let him know so.
Oph. No more but so?
Ham. You should not have believ'd me; for virtue cannot so
Ham. No, by the rood, not so!
The rather, if you could devise it so
If damned custom have not braz'd it so
I do repent; but heaven hath pleas'd it so,
promise-cramm'd. You cannot feed capons so.
That I have Positively said ''Tis so,'
And as my love is siz'd, my fear is so.
mirth, forgone all custom of exercises; and indeed, it goes so
Hor. 'Twere to consider too curiously, to consider so.  
Such dear concernings hide? Who would do so?  
Osr. Shall I redeliver you e'en so?
Ber. I think it be no other but e'en so.
Hor. E'en so.
Oph. Indeed, my lord, you made me believe so.
Christians, nor the gait of Christian, pagan, nor man, have so
As he would draw it. Long stay'd he so.
Who does it, then? His madness. If't be so,
Laer. Let this be so.
King. It shall be so.
Other. Why, 'tis found so.
King. Faith, I must leave thee, love, and shortly too;  
monsters you make of them. To a nunnery, go; and quickly too.
King. Sweet Gertrude, leave us too;
Hor. Ay, my lord, And of calveskins too.
very warlike appointment gave us chase. Finding ourselves too
Importing Denmark's health, and England's too,
to speak in thine ear will make thee dumb; yet are they much too
Hor. Let him bless thee too.
Ham. The point envenom'd too?
Ros. Ay, that they do, my lord- Hercules and his load too.
discovery, and your secrecy to the King and Queen moult no
Ham. That if you be honest and fair, your honesty should admit no
more than their even-Christen. Come, my spade! There is no
me, whether you were sent for or no.  
If't be th' affliction of his love, or no,
Ham. How if I answer no?
Laer. No.
scarcely lie in this box; and must th' inheritor himself have no
Ham. O wonderful son, that can so stonish a mother! But is there no
No.
Ham. His beard was grizzled- no?
Or ever I had seen that day, Horatio!
Exit Horatio.
[Exit Horatio.]  
Mar. Thou art a scholar; speak to it, Horatio.
Mar. Question it, Horatio.
Ber. Looks it not like the King? Mark it, Horatio.
Ham. Yes, by Saint Patrick, but there is, Horatio,
Enter Horatio.
Ham. What, ho, Horatio!
There are more things in heaven and earth, Horatio,
[Retires with Horatio.]  
And what make you from Wittenberg, Horatio?
Ham. In my mind's eye, Horatio.
Ham. O, I die, Horatio!
favour she must come. Make her laugh at that. Prithee, Horatio,
But I am very sorry, good Horatio,
Their grand commission; where I found, Horatio
Exeunt all but Hamlet and Horatio.
Enter Hamlet and Horatio.
Ham. Saw? who?
tatters, to very rags, to split the cars of the groundlings, who
Ham. Between who?
Lord. My lord, his Majesty commended him to you by young Osric, who
Help, help, ho!
O, ho!
Osr. Look to the Queen there, ho!
Why to a public count I might not go
Hor. Be rul'd. You shall not go.
Which bewept to the grave did not go
and shows a most pitiful ambition in the fool that uses it. Go  
But let that go.
As infinite as man may undergo-  
I do beseech you give him leave to go.
And end his being. That done, he lets me go,
Gonzago'?
Ham. He poisons him i' th' garden for's estate. His name's Gonzago.  
O, the recorders! Let me see one. To withdraw with you- why do
Ham. Not this, by no means, that I bid you do:
Ham. 'Swounds, show me what thou't do.
I once did hold it, as our statists do,
Do not as some ungracious pastors do,
He may not, as unvalued persons do,
players do, I had as live the town crier spoke my lines. Nor do
Fran. Bernardo?
Enter Horatio, Marcellus, and Bernardo.
Mar. Holla, Bernardo!
That you know aught of me- this is not to do,
Why yet I live to say 'This thing's to do,'
And let them know both what we mean to do
My stern effects. Then what I have to do
My operant powers their functions leave to do.
If it shall please you to make me a wholesome answer, I will do
Exit Reynaldo.
And in part him.' Do you mark this, Reynaldo?
Pol. Give him this money and these notes, Reynaldo.
Pol. You shall do marvell's wisely, good Reynaldo,
Enter Polonius and Reynaldo.
Queen. What shall I do?
Say, why is this? wherefore? What should we do?
That he should weep for her? What would he do,
Dies in his own too-much. That we would do,
Ber. 'Tis now struck twelve. Get thee to bed, Francisco.
Oph. You must sing 'A-down a-down, and you call him a-down-a.' O,
His greatness weigh'd, his will is not his own;
desert, and who should scape whipping? Use them after your own  
Our thoughts are ours, their ends none of our own.
That our devices still are overthrown;
Oph. O, what a noble mind is here o'erthrown!
Deliberate pause. Diseases desperate grown
As if increase of appetite had grown
Clown. How can that be, unless she drown'd herself in her own
Now wears his crown.
As are companions noted and most known
Antiquity forgot, custom not known,
[Exit Second Clown.]  
With an entreaty, herein further shown,
Enter the Ghost in his nightgown.
Leave wringing of your hinds. Peace! sit you down
My tables! Meet it is I set it down
As therein are set down.
And break your own neck down.
And, as he drains his draughts of Rhenish down,
Lord. The King and Queen and all are coming down.
Hor. Well, sit we down,
Th' observ'd of all observers- quite, quite down!
They had begun the play. I sat me down;
Enter two Sentinels-[first,] Francisco, [who paces up and down
And thrice his head thus waving up and down,
'So would I 'a' done, by yonder sun,
Ham. Not so, my lord. I am too much i' th' sun.
Our wills and fates do so contrary run
But, orderly to end where I begun,  
himself; there are no tongues else for's turn.
your mother's commandment; if not, your pardon and my return
occasion of my sudden and more strange return.
The undiscover'd country, from whose bourn
Since frost itself as actively doth burn,
The cock, that is the trumpet to the morn,
Both countenance and excuse. Ho, Guildenstern!
King. Thanks, Rosencrantz and gentle Guildenstern.
Exeunt [Rosencrantz and Guildenstern].
Exeunt Rosencrantz and Guildenstern]
[Exeunt Rosencrantz and Guildenstern.]
Exeunt Rosencrantz and Guildenstern.
[Exeunt Rosencrantz and Guildenstern
Enter Polonius, Rosencrantz, and Guildenstern.
Enter Rosencrantz and Guildenstern.
Enter Rosencrantz and Guildenstern.
Enter Rosencrantz and Guildenstern.
Enter Rosencrantz and Guildenstern.
King. Welcome, dear Rosencrantz and Guildenstern.
Enter King and Queen, with Rosencrantz and Guildenstern.
Enter King, Rosencrantz, and Guildenstern.
For. Go softly on.
Ham. It shall to the barber's, with your beard.- Prithee say on.
For he was likely, had he been put on,
On Fortune's cap we are not the very button.
You laying these slight sullies on my son
But now, my cousin Hamlet, and my son-
Than that which dearest father bears his son
Where is your son?
Good Gertrude, set some watch over your son.-
Our chiefest courtier, cousin, and our son.
Ham. If it assume my noble father's person,
Let him go, Gertrude. Do not fear our person.  
deserved at the hands of Fortune that she sends you to prison
Ham. Denmark's a prison.
or bad but thinking makes it so. To me it is a prison.
Start up and stand an end. O gentle son,
demanded of a sponge, what replication should be made by the son
Hor. Indeed? I heard it not. It then draws near the season
fay, I cannot reason.
All. Treason! treason!
Now see that noble and most sovereign reason,
Which might deprive your sovereignty of reason
Oft breaking down the pales and forts of reason,
(O God! a beast that wants discourse of reason
That capability and godlike reason
Ham. Does it not, thinks't thee, stand me now upon-
Hor. Indeed, my lord, it followed hard upon.
Ham. What's his weapon?
Ham. 'Tis well. I'll have thee speak out the rest of this soon.-
My custom always of the afternoon,
If she unmask her beauty to the moon.
Revisits thus the glimpses of the moon,
Queen. So many journeys may the sun and moon
And his sandal shoon.
To put an antic disposition on),  
And why such daily cast of brazen cannon
Ham. Ay, madam, it is common.
For what we know must be, and is as common
Ham. But yet methinks it is very sultry and hot for my complexion.
By the o'ergrowth of some complexion,
about the mazzard with a sexton's spade. Here's fine revolution,
And thus the native hue of resolution
But since, so jump upon this bloody question,
That I must call't in question.
By this encompassment and drift of question
Ham. To be, or not to be- that is the question:
went to cuffs in the question.
Shall in the general censure take corruption
That might your nature, honour, and exception
Guil. But with much forcing of his disposition.
So horridly to shake our disposition
Why should we in our peevish opposition
Capt. Truly to speak, and with no addition,
According to the phrase or the addition
discretion.
And could of men distinguish, her election
And keep you in the rear of your affection,  
Who, dipping all his faults in their affection,
Mar. Look with what courteous action
innovation.
seeks her own salvation?
him and he her. She kneels, and makes show of protestation
And they in France of the best rank and station
No noble rite nor formal ostentation,-
Ghost. Do not forget. This visitation
amazement and admiration.
The very place puts toys of desperation,
If one could match you. The scrimers of their nation
To show my duty in your coronation,  
I have in quick determination
Hor. He waxes desperate with imagination.
And gem of all the nation.
Ros. Faith, there has been much to do on both sides; and the nation
That flesh is heir to. 'Tis a consummation  
This present object made probation.
I'll cross it, though it blast me.- Stay illusion!
Get from him why he puts on this confusion,
hold up Adam's profession.
When we would bring him on to some confession
against their own succession.
Had he the motive and the cue for passion
Into a tow'ring passion.
But in a fiction, in a dream of passion,
Thence to a lightness, and, by this declension,
Ros. To visit you, my lord; no other occasion.
But, in the gross and scope of my opinion,
A scullion!  
In honourable fashion.
And prologue to the omen coming on,
And he not from his reason fall'n thereon
Give us the foils. Come on.
And bow them to your gracious leave and pardon.
I had forgot! 'Tis so concluded on.
Such was the very armour he had on
How now O What hath befall'n?
King. Our son shall win.
Cut off even in the blossoms of my sin,
honour and dignity. The less they deserve, the more merit is in
Ham. My lord, I have news to tell you. When Roscius was an actor in
And after we will both our judgments join
Ham. I do not think so. Since he went into France I have been in
Ham. I dare not confess that, lest I should compare with him in
King. Thyself do grace to them, and bring them in.
your bounty. Take them in.
Ham. Compounded it with dust, whereto 'tis kin.
Ham. How chances it they travel? Their residence, both in
To tell my story.         [March afar off, and shot within.]
Whiles rank corruption, mining all within,
[March within.]
[Drum; trumpets sound; a piece goes off [within].
Give, me superfluous death.                  A noise within.
A noise within.
Is very cunning in.
[Exit the Queen. Then] Exit Hamlet, tugging in
Of entrance to a quarrel; but being in,
Since nature cannot choose his origin,-
I stand in pause where I shall first begin,
And, as the world were now but to begin,
'Now the King drinks to Hamlet.' Come, begin.
especially where he speaks of Priam's slaughter. If it live in
piece of work is a man! how noble in reason! how infinite in
twenty, forty, fifty, a hundred ducats apiece for his picture in
To his confine; and of the truth herein
All. No, let's come in!
A noise within: 'Let her come in.'
Queen. Let her come in.  
Hor. Let them come in.
valanc'd since I saw thee last. Com'st' thou to' beard me in
faculties! in form and moving how express and admirable! in
Ham. Not a whit, we defy augury; there's a special providence in
his authorities. But such officers do the King best service in
receiv'd it, and others, whose judgments in such matters cried in
Ham. Up from my cabin,
And never come mischance between us twain!
Queen. O Hamlet, thou hast cleft my heart in twain.
Then weigh what loss your honour may sustain
Hor. That is most certain.
Ham. Not where he eats, but where he is eaten. A certain
A Norwegian Captain.
Exeunt [all but the Captain].
Without more motive, into every brain
Within the book and volume of my brain,
Queen. Sleep rock thy brain,  
Queen. This is the very coinage of your brain.
And in this harsh world draw thy breath in pain,
And we beseech you, bend you to remain
Queen. I doubt it is no other but the main,
Laer. It is here, Hamlet. Hamlet, thou art slain;
Hamlet in madness hath Polonius slain,
But in battalions! First, her father slain;
That he which hath your noble father slain
Pol. [behind] O, I am slain!
Polonius, Lord Chamberlain.
With this slave's offal. Bloody bawdy villain!
Remorseless, treacherous, lecherous, kindless villain!
O villain, villain, smiling, damned villain!
That one may smile, and smile, and be a villain;
Ham. A murtherer and a villain!
Will bring him to his wonted way again,
Would have reverted to my bow again,
Enter Ghost again.
Now fear I this will give it start again;
And the King's rouse the heaven shall bruit again,
But soft! behold! Lo, where it comes again!
Mar. Peace! break thee off! Look where it comes again!
Laer. Well, again!
Perchance 'twill walk again.
Whose worth, if praises may go back again,
And will he not come again?
And will he not come again?
He never will come again.
I shall not look upon his like again.
again.
Will nothing stick Our person to arraign
But never the offence. To bear all smooth and even,
Unmix'd with baser matter. Yes, by heaven!
Hor. Not I, my lord, by heaven!
Then trip him, that his heels may kick at heaven,
As oft as any passion under heaven
Show me the steep and thorny way to heaven,
Take it to heart? Fie! 'tis a fault to heaven,
It shows a will most incorrect to heaven,
O, my offence is rank, it smells to heaven;
And now I'll do't. And so he goes to heaven,
Against thy mother aught. Leave her to heaven,
Infects unseen. Confess yourself to heaven;
To heaven.
Would I had met my dearest foe in heaven
Had made his course t' illume that part of heaven
With almost all the holy vows of heaven.
Would have made milch the burning eyes of heaven
That he might not beteem the winds of heaven
And bowl the round nave down the hill of heaven,
Though lewdness court it in a shape of heaven,
And how his audit stands, who knows save heaven?
suit of sables. O heavens! die two months ago, and not forgotten
Ros. To think, my lord, if you delight not in man, what lenten
that will themselves laugh, to set on some quantity of barren
On plots and errors happen.
Or lose your heart, or your chaste treasure open
Unto our climature and countrymen.
the only men.
So oft it chances in particular men
The form of plausive manners, that these men
Pol. Well be with you, gentlemen!
Exeunt Gentlemen.
Come hither, gentlemen,
Ham. Rest, rest, perturbed spirit! So, gentlemen,
All. Gentlemen!
Upon the witness of these gentlemen,
Hor. Two nights together had these gentlemen
Still am I call'd. Unhand me, gentlemen.
The imminent death of twenty thousand men
Ham. Slanders, sir; for the satirical rogue says here that old men
Queen. Ay, amen!
And with such maimed rites? This doth betoken
your whoreson dead body. Here's a skull now. This skull hath lien
Be you and I behind an arras then.
O heavy burthen!
But if the gods themselves did see her then,
Ham. What woman then?
King. Will you know them then?
carry cannon by our sides. I would it might be hangers till then.  
When honour's at the stake. How stand I then,
Osr. The King, sir, hath laid that, in a dozen passes between
will leave him and suddenly contrive the means of meeting between
And that your Grace hath screen'd and stood between
My crown, mine own ambition, and my queen.
[Exit Queen.]
How now, sweet queen?
The will of my most seeming-virtuous queen.
Therefore our sometime sister, now our queen,
Enter Queen.
Ham. How does the Queen?
This to your Majesty; this to the Queen.
Enter [two Players as] King and Queen.  
have not craft enough to colour. I know the good King and Queen
1. Play. 'But who, O who, had seen the mobled queen-'
Ham. 'The mobled queen'?
Will so bestow ourselves that, seeing unseen,
Ham. Never to speak of this that you have seen.
What we two nights have seen.
I know my course. The spirit that I have seen
It is a damned ghost that we have seen,
Oph. You are keen, my lord, you are keen.
And thirty dozed moons with borrowed sheen
Hath scald thee for herself. For thou hast been
About the world have times twelve thirties been,
Fie on't! ah, fie! 'Tis an unweeded garden
Mar. Shall I strike at it with my partisan?
Did the king sigh, but with a general groan.
And we cast away moan.
Thou canst not then be false to any man.
To sound what stop she please. Give me that man
King. A Norman.
O most pernicious woman!
Let me not think on't! Frailty, thy name is woman!-
is this quintessence of dust? Man delights not me- no, nor woman
would perhaps trouble a woman.
Speak, man.
Holds such an enmity with blood of man
Ham. Ay, sir. To be honest, as this world goes, is to be one man
[Exit Gentleman.]
Ham. What imports the nomination of this gentleman
'Good sir,' or so, or 'friend,' or 'gentleman'-
Like a good child and a true gentleman.
newly come to court Laertes; believe me, an absolute gentleman,
He closes thus: 'I know the gentleman.
But pardon't, as you are a gentleman.
Ros. Most like a gentleman.
Other. Was he a gentleman?
Enter Horatio, Queen, and a Gentleman.
gentleman.'
For the apparel oft proclaims the man,
Sith nor th' exterior nor the inward man
The unseen good old man.
Ham. Horatio, thou art e'en as just a man
Ham. Then I would you were so honest a man.
Ham. As th'art a man,
And spur my dull revenge! What is a man,
To give the world assurance of a man.
did the first murther! This might be the pate of a Politician,
That I might be the organ.
To cast thee up again. What may this mean  
So much as from occasion you may glean,  
the point: if I drown myself wittingly, it argues an act; and an
honesty from what it is to a bawd than the force of honesty can
escoted? Will they pursue the quality no longer than they can
And, like the kind life-rend'ring pelican,
Enter Fortinbras and English Ambassadors, with Drum,
Th' unnerved father falls. Then senseless Ilium,
of the fish that hath fed of that worm.
But, as we often see, against some storm,
Ham. Ay, truly; for the power of beauty will sooner transform
act hath three branches-it is to act, to do, and to perform;
The glass of fashion and the mould of form,
And there assume some other, horrible form
Together with that fair and warlike form
In filial obligation for some term
Then goes he to the length of all his arm,
And, as the sleeping soldiers in th' alarm,
No fairy takes, nor witch hath power to charm,
At last, a little shaking of mine arm,
Hor. Is it a custom?
And to the manner born, it is a custom
The soul of Nero enter this firm bosom.
I'll lug the guts into the neighbour room.-
With tristful visage, as against the doom,
A thought which, quarter'd, hath but one part wisdom
I have some rights of memory in this kingdom
To bear our hearts in grief, and our whole kingdom
Mar. Let's follow. 'Tis not fit thus to obey him.
Queen. But not by him!
Queen. Did you assay him  
Mar. Nay, let's follow him.
Ham. Let me see. [Takes the skull.] Alas, poor Yorick! I knew him,  
More than his father's death, that thus hath put him
King. Well, we shall sift him.
Let his queen mother all alone entreat him  
at his post; then] Bernardo, [who approaches him].
1. Play. 'Anon he finds him,
Rey. My lord, that would dishonour him.
Speak loudly for him.
To our most valiant brother. So much for him.
That is not passion's slave, and I will wear him
Queen. For love of God, forbear him!
Is the great love the general gender bear him,
'Thine evermore, most dear lady, whilst this machine is to him,
Pol. At such a time I'll loose my daughter to him.
Pleasant and helpful to him!
This spirit, dumb to us, will speak to him.
Pol. He will come straight. Look you lay home to him.
Yet must not we put the strong law on him.
Addicted so and so'; and there put on him
King. I pray thee, good Horatio, wait upon him.
You must not put another scandal on him,
And thus a while the fit will work on him.
That we with wisest sorrow think on him
Must I remember? Why, she would hang on him
Osr. I mean, sir, for his weapon; but in the imputation laid on him
Did not together pluck such envy from him
We cannot get from him.  
him about the sconce with a dirty shovel, and will not tell him
No more to undertake it, I will work him
[Grapples with him].
That, being of so young clays brought up with him,
Pray you be round with him.
To show his grief. Let her be round with him;
Osr. Your lordship speaks most infallibly of him.
Ham. Ay, sir, what of him?
Take you, as 'twere, some distant knowledge of him;
Hor. A piece of him.
And will not let belief take hold of him
Hor. I did very well note him.
Hor. Heaven secure him!
Oph. O heavenly powers, restore him!
This night to play before him.
And that he calls for drink, I'll have prepar'd him
(For so this side of our known world esteem'd him)
We o'erraught on the way. Of these we told him,
And from his mother's closet hath he dragg'd him.
are no better), their writers do them wrong to make them exclaim
Of him that brought them.
King. From Hamlet? Who brought them?
King. Laertes, you shall hear them.
That, for some vicious mole of nature in them,
help to hasten them?
Do you believe his tenders, as you call them?
But our cold maids do dead men's fingers call them.
speak no more than is set down for them. For there be of them
I pray you, now receive them.
They were given me by Claudio; he receiv'd them
You must translate; 'tis fit we understand them.
And not where I had aim'd them.
Which, as her winks and nods and gestures yield them,
entertainment the players shall receive from you. We coted them
This sudden sending him away must seem
'That can denote me truly. These indeed seem,
Now falls on Priam.
That shows his hoar leaves in the glassy stream.
the ambitious is merely the shadow of a dream.
Ham. I shall in all my best obey you, madam.
Ham. Good madam!
Thou turn'st mine eyes into my very soul,
I hold my duty as I hold my soul,
Even with the very comment of thy soul
Laer. The devil take thy soul!
God 'a'mercy on his soul!
Was not like madness. There's something in his soul
To take him in the purging of his soul,
Lay not that flattering unction to your soul
And we shall jointly labour with your soul
O, step between her and her fighting soul
When the blood burns, how prodigal the soul
She's so conjunctive to my life and soul
The inward service of the mind and soul
Ham. O my prophetic soul!
And my imaginations are as foul
As we have warranty. Her death was doubtful;
Mar. O, wonderful!
Pol. Affection? Pooh! You speak like a green girl,
Ham. Let the doors be shut upon him, that he may play the fool
Running it thus) you'll tender me a fool.  
Throws up [another skull].
[Puts down the skull.]
[Throws up a skull.]
Our sovereign process, which imports at full,
Of unimproved mettle hot and full,  
That we are made of stuff so flat and dull
All flaxen was his poll.
And thy best graces spend it at thy will!
know if your pleasure hold to play with Laertes, or that you will
Make choice of whom your wisest friends you will,
Hor. I warr'nt it will.
fingers and thumbs, give it breath with your mouth, and it will
Clown. Cudgel thy brains no more about it, for your dull ass will
And reason panders will.
of a pair of indentures? The very conveyances of his lands will
Though inclination be as sharp as will.
Ham. I will.
Rough-hew them how we will-
All. We will, we will!
Hor. What is't, my lord? We will.
Ham. To this effect, sir, after what flourish your nature will.
No traveller returns- puzzles the will,
To show us so much gentry and good will
Clown. Why, sir, his hide is so tann'd with his trade that 'a will
And nothing is at a like goodness still;
Ham. It waves me still.
Let it be tenable in your silence still;
A silence in the heavens, the rack stand still,
The Scripture says Adam digg'd. Could he dig without arms? I'll
have not the skill.
We must with all our majesty and skill
New lighted on a heaven-kissing hill:
Walks o'er the dew of yon high eastward hill.
King. Let him demand his fill.
Queen. Did he receive you well?
I will requite your loves. So, fare you well.
Ham. I am glad to see you well.
Ham. That's two of his weapons- but well.
Pol. 'And in part him, but,' you may say, 'not well.
Ham. Thou pray'st not well.
My father's spirit- in arms? All is not well.
Our indiscretion sometime serves us well
King. It likes us well;
Clown. I like thy wit well, in good faith. The gallows does well.
I will bestow him, and will answer well
Laer. Farewell, Ophelia, and remember well
And for my means, I'll husband them so well
Ham. I humbly thank you; well, well, well.
love passing well.
The which he loved passing well.'
Pol. God b' wi' ye, fare ye well!
King. We doubt it nothing. Heartily farewell.
Ham. Your loves, as mine to you. Farewell.
Queen. Sweets to the sweet! Farewell.
Pol. Farewell!
Thou wretched, rash, intruding fool, farewell!
nowhere but in's own house. Farewell.
for England. Of them I have much to tell thee. Farewell.
Laer. My necessaries are embark'd. Farewell.
Farewell.
Let me not burst in ignorance, but tell
Other. Mass, I cannot tell.
Other. Marry, now I can tell!
But the great cannon to the clouds shall tell,
O shame! where is thy blush? Rebellious hell,
Bring with thee airs from heaven or blasts from hell,
As if he had been loosed out of hell
Prompted to my revenge by heaven and hell,
A little ere the mightiest Julius fell,
What feast is toward in thine eternal cell
And bid me hold my peace. I pray you all,
Pol. Madam, I swear I use no art at all.
Or not at all.
(Unless things mortal move them not at all)
And so, without more circumstance at all,
Thus conscience does make cowards of us all,  
Ears without hands or eyes, smelling sans all,
do, crawling between earth and heaven? We are arrant knaves all;
The better to beguile. This is for all:
His liberty is full of threats to all-
Ham. He was a man, take him for all in all.
they'll tell all.
Ham. He that plays the king shall be welcome- his Majesty shall
King. So you shall;
That you, at such times seeing me, never shall,
target; the lover shall not sigh gratis; the humorous man shall
And let me wring your heart; for so I shall
But I am pigeon-liver'd and lack gall
Under the which he shall not choose but fall;
And never did the Cyclops' hammers fall
Ber. Last night of all,
To be forestalled ere we come to fall,  
And where th' offence is let the great axe fall.
May fit us to our shape. If this should fall,
not saw the air too much with your hand, thus, but use all
the fashion, and so berattle the common stages (so they call
In further evil?
To hell, allegiance! vows, to the blackest devil
Let my disclaiming from a purpos'd evil
into a toil?
When we have shuffled off this mortal coil,
From that particular fault. The dram of e'il
The wind sits in the shoulder of your sail,
memory, and yet but yaw neither in respect of his quick sail.
Ham. We shall know by this fellow. The players cannot keep counsel;
Ham. Methinks it is like a weasel.
Pol. It is back'd like a weasel.
was converted) might they not stop a beer barrel?
With variable objects, shall expel
And bear it to the chapel.
Ham. Do you see yonder cloud that's almost in shape of a camel?
Grapple them unto thy soul with hoops of steel;
Bow, stubborn knees; and heart with strings of steel,
That thou, dead corse, again in complete steel,
What's near it with it. It is a massy wheel,
Break all the spokes and fellies from her wheel,
Queen. One woe doth tread upon another's heel,
Look where he goes even now out at the portal!
Let me be cruel, not unnatural;
But this most foul, strange, and unnatural.
history, pastoral, pastoral-comical, historical-pastoral,
Hor. My lord, I came to see your father's funeral.
His means of death, his obscure funeral-
Ambassador. The sight is dismal;
With juice of cursed hebona in a vial,
The crowner hath sate on her, and finds it Christian burial.
gentlewoman, she should have been buried out o' Christian burial.
Of bell and burial.
Osr. I mean, my lord, the opposition of your person in trial.
laid on twelve for nine, and it would come to immediate trial
Than the main voice of Denmark goes withal.
As e'er my conversation cop'd withal.
Where every god did seem to set his seal
(My fears forgetting manners) to unseal
which was the model of that Danish seal;
King. Now must your conscience my acquittance seal,
Doth all the noble substance often dout To his own scandal.
air, look you, this brave o'erhanging firmament, this majestical
We do it wrong, being so majestical,
Why such impress of shipwrights, whose sore task
And marshal me to knavery. Let it work;
What might you think? No, I went round to work
How now, my lord? Will the King hear this piece of work?
Aroused vengeance sets him new awork;
Oph. Say you? Nay, pray You mark.
Oph. Pray you mark.
Osr. Your lordship is right welcome back to Denmark.
From whence though willingly I came to Denmark
And let thine eye look like a friend on Denmark.
for your succession in Denmark?
Ham. There's neer a villain dwelling in all Denmark
Oph. Where is the beauteous Majesty of Denmark?
A serpent stung me. So the whole ear of Denmark
Claudius, King of Denmark.
Mar. Something is rotten in the state of Denmark.
THE TRAGEDY OF HAMLET, PRINCE OF DENMARK
In which the majesty of buried Denmark
A very noble youth. Mark.
Who in her duty and obedience, mark,
Couch we awhile, and mark.
My sea-gown scarf'd about me, in the dark
And, in this upshot, purposes mistook
Queen. There is a willow grows aslant a brook,
Sprinkle cool patience! Whereon do you look?
The first row of the pious chanson will show you more; for look
We will bestow ourselves.- [To Ophelia] Read on this book,
If I had play'd the desk or table book,
Enter Hamlet, reading on a book.
King. Gertrude, do not drink.
Till that her garments, heavy with their drink,
Pol. I would fain prove so. But what might you think,  
King. Break not your sleeps for that. You must not think
breeding but to play at loggets with 'em? Mine ache to think
Your wisdom best shall think.
Or my dear Majesty your queen here, think,
Oph. I do not know, my lord, what I should think,
What forgeries you please; marry, none so rank
As level as the cannon to his blank,
I bought an unction of a mountebank,
As it did seem to shatter all his bulk
Clown. Why, there thou say'st! And the more pity that great folk
And curd, like eager droppings into milk,
Wherein the spirit held his wont to walk.
And with a larger tether may he walk
Does not divide the Sunday from the week.
If he by chance escape your venom'd stuck,
So bloodily hast struck.
Mar. No, it is struck.
and his tricks? Why does he suffer this rude knave now to knock
A very, very- pajock.
Mar. It faded on the crowing of the cock.
Of reverend Priam, seem'd i' th' air to stick.
To be a preparation 'gainst the Polack,  
So levied as before, against the Polack;
Nor customary suits of solemn black,
And that his soul may be as damn'd and black
Queen. Alack,
What should this mean? Are all the rest come back?
But what we do determine oft we break.
visitation? Come, deal justly with me. Come, come! Nay, speak.
King. Why, now You speak
King. I do believe you think what now you speak;
And let the kettle to the trumpet speak,
But from what cause he will by no means speak.
Hor. Of that I shall have also cause to speak,
O, speak!
Queen. Nay, then I'll set those to you that can speak.
For murther, though it have no tongue, will speak
Did sometimes march? By heaven I charge thee speak!
Hor. Stay! Speak, speak! I charge thee speak!
And my young mistress thus I did bespeak:
Itself to motion, like as it would speak;
A dull and muddy-mettled rascal, peak
O, you must wear your rue with a difference! There's a daisy. I
Guil. But these cannot I command to any utt'rance of harmony. I
Ham. I am but mad north-north-west. When the wind is southerly I
Scene VI.
Ham. No, not I!
My lord, not I.
Yet I,
o'erweigh a whole theatre of others. O, there be players that I
Pol. If you call me Jephthah, my lord, I have a daughter that I
Ham. They are sheep and calves which seek out assurance in that. I  
Like wonder-wounded hearers? This is I,
As I do thee. Something too much of this I
them shape, or time to act them in. What should such fellows as I
not the million, 'twas caviary to the general; but it was (as I
boarded them. On the instant they got clear of our ship; so I
Ham. Who, I?
pocky corses now-a-days that will scarce hold the laying in, I
Hor. That can I.
Fall'n on th' inventors' heads. All this can I
O what a rogue and peasant slave am I!
Be buried quick with her, and so will I.
Scene VII.
Scene III.
Scene III.
Scene III.
Scene II.
Scene II.
Scene II.
Scene II.
Scene II.
Ham. Sir, his definement suffers no perdition in you; though, I  
with you in this garb, lest my extent to the players (which I
reason and sanity could not so prosperously be delivered of. I
Ham.   A whole one I!
ACT V. Scene I.
ACT IV. Scene I.
ACT I. Scene I.
Act II. Scene I.
ACT III. Scene I.
slow of sail, we put on a compelled valour, and in the grapple I
Ham. Come, come, and sit you down. You shall not budge I
How much I had to do to calm his rage I
Pol. With what, i' th' name of God I
Your bait of falsehood takes this carp of truth;
What is between you? Give me up the truth.
That unmatch'd form and feature of blown youth
And in the morn and liquid dew of youth
King. A very riband in the cap of youth-
Rankly abus'd. But know, thou noble youth,
Make Ossa like a wart! Nay, an thou'lt mouth,
Hor. Not from his mouth,
The hand more instrumental to the mouth,
Holding a weak supposal of our worth,
Videlicet, a brothel, or so forth.
I would not, in plain terms, from this time forth
To hide the slain? O, from this time forth,
For he himself is subject to his birth.
'This must be so.' We pray you throw to earth
Cry to be heard, as 'twere from heaven to earth,
The cannons to the heavens, the heaven to earth,
Laer. Lay her i' th' earth;
Ham. Dost thou think Alexander look'd o' this fashion i' th' earth?
Extorted treasure in the womb of earth
Ros. As the indifferent children of the earth.
heavily with my disposition that this goodly frame, the earth,
Visit her face too roughly. Heaven and earth!
thy damnable faces, and begin! Come, the croaking raven doth
I cannot dream of. I entreat you both
King. I do not fear it, I have seen you both;
Giving more light than heat, extinct in both
Rosencrantz! Good lads, how do ye both?
By what it fed on; and yet, within a month-
Than I to Hercules. Within a month,
Here's to thy health.
better proposer could charge you withal, be even and direct with
Tell him his pranks have been too broad to bear with,
tutor. Suit the action to the word, the word to the action; with
Laer. How came he dead? I'll not be juggled with:
Ham. No, no! They do but jest, poison in jest; no offence i' th'
Hor. In faith,
Mar. Nor I, my lord- in faith.
Ham. This likes me well. These foils have all a length?
Ham. Gentlemen, you are welcome to Elsinore. Your hands, come! Th'
That I shall live and tell him to his teeth,
his purchases, and double ones too, than the length and breadth
yourself and him, he shall not exceed you three hits; he hath
Ham. I have heard of your paintings too, well enough. God hath
rawer breath
The King shall drink to Hamlet's better breath,
Queen. He's fat, and scant of breath.
Queen. Be thou assur'd, if words be made of breath,
Nor windy suspiration of forc'd breath,
And hears it roar beneath.
Is by a forged process of my death
To muddy death.
Had I but time (as this fell sergeant, Death,
King. Though yet of Hamlet our dear brother's death
Or thinking by our late dear brother's death
Which I have told thee, of my father's death.  
With pestilent speeches of his father's death,
That I am guiltless of your father's death,
O wretched state! O bosom black as death!
He never gave commandment for their death.
But that the dread of something after death-
(For which, they say, you spirits oft walk in death),
Why thy canoniz'd bones, hearsed in death,
He should the bearers put to sudden death,
Under the moon, can save the thing from death
It may be death.
Fort. This quarry cries on havoc. O proud Death,
We'll put the matter to the present push.-
Like sweet bells jangled, out of tune and harsh;
And for your part, Ophelia, I do wish
As love between them like the palm might flourish,
Sound a flourish. [Enter Trumpets and Kettledrums. Danish
And from her fair and unpolluted flesh  
For, though I am not splenitive and rash,
Stoops to his base, and with a hideous crash
Ham. Nothing but to show you how a king may go a progress through
That swift as quicksilverr it courses through
The chariest maid is prodigal enough
form and pressure. Now this overdone, or come tardy off, though
And then this 'should' is like a spendthrift sigh,
Ham. Make you a wholesome answer; my wit's diseas'd. But, sir, such
As if I had never been such.
Without the sensible and true avouch
The sun no sooner shall the mountains touch
You have been talk'd of since your travel much,
A baseness to write fair, and labour'd much
Hath clawed me in his clutch,
Why this same strict and most observant watch
With martial stalk hath he gone by our watch.
(Marcellus and Bernardo) on their watch
And I with them the third night kept the watch;
I your commission will forthwith dispatch,
Out of his subject; and we here dispatch
Laer. To cut his throat i' th' church!
And now no soil nor cautel doth besmirch
Appears before them and with solemn march
Craves the conveyance of a promis'd march
If aught of woe or wonder, cease your search.
against the which he has impon'd, as I take it, six French
I have seen myself, and serv'd against, the French,
assigns, and three liberal-conceited carriages: that's the French
I'll tent him to the quick. If he but blench,
My virtue or my plague, be it either which,-
his replies are! a happiness that often madness hits on, which
plentiful lack of wit, together with most weak hams. All which,
[To Laertes] Strengthen your patience in our last night's speech.
taste of your quality. Come, a passionate speech.
Do not itself unkennel in one speech,
And cleave the general ear with horrid speech;
And thus do we of wisdom and of reach,
will speak to this fellow. Whose grave's this, sirrah?
Ham. And smelt so? Pah!
Ham. My excellent good friends! How dost thou, Guildenstern? Ah,
Ham. Am I not i' th' right, old Jephthah?
I pray thee stay with us, go not to Wittenberg.
In going back to school in Wittenberg,
But what, in faith, make you from Wittenberg?
are unwrung.
Believe so much in him, that he is young,
Queen. Alas, sweet lady, what imports this song?
Ham. Give me your pardon, sir. I have done you wrong;
Ham. Very like, very like. Stay'd it long?  
The bird of dawning singeth all night long;
Pol. This is too long.
Therefore I have entreated him along,  
the puppets dallying.
Ham. Now might I do it pat, now he is praying;
If he steal aught the whilst this play is playing,
nature: for anything so overdone is from the purpose of playing,  
When I had seen this hot love on the wing
Most generous, and free from all contriving,
And sure I am two men there are not living
Forward, not permanent- sweet, not lasting;
A broken voice, and his whole function suiting
Ham. Sir, in my heart there was a kind of fighting
Now for ourself and for this time of meeting.
Fran. Not a mouse stirring.
The canker galls the infants of the spring
light for the bore of the matter. These good fellows will bring
Ham. Is this a prologue, or the posy of a ring?
Ghost. Pity me not, but lend thy serious hearing
The ears are senseless that should give us bearing
A chalice for the nonce; whereon but sipping,
His silence will sit drooping.
Rey. Good my lord!                                    [Going.]
shows and noise. I would have such a fellow whipp'd for o'erdoing
Awake the god of day; and at his warning,
Ham. Upon the talk of the poisoning?
Queen. I'll warrant you; fear me not. Withdraw; I hear him coming.
In censure of his seeming.
When thou liest howling.
Pol. Ay, or drinking, fencing, swearing, quarrelling,
That great baby you see there is not yet out of his swaddling
Hor. I saw him once. He was a goodly king.  
At least, the whisper goes so. Our last king,
Hamlet, son to the former, and nephew to the present king.
Both to my God and to my gracious king;
'Laertes shall be king! Laertes king!'
That shall not be my offer, not thy asking?
As 'twere a thing a little soil'd i' th' working,
Enter King.
Enter King.
Enter [priests with] a coffin [in funeral procession], King,
For. Go, Captain, from me greet the Danish king.
O thou vile king,
Ham. Nay, I know not. Is it the King?
Then, venom, to thy work.                    Hurts the King.
But soft! but soft! aside! Here comes the King-
This is one Lucianus, nephew to the King.
To lack discretion. Come, go we to the King.
Ham. An earnest conjuration from the King,
Pol. Come, go with me. I will go seek the King.
Ber. Long live the King!
the King.
There is a play to-night before the King.
Mar. Is it not like the King?
Comes armed through our watch, so like the King
They cry 'Choose we! Laertes shall be king!'
This man shall set me packing.
And can say nothing! No, not for a king,
grave-making?
Even in their promise, as it is a-making,
Queen. As kill a king?
of a king?
There's such divinity doth hedge a king
Hor. And then it started, like a guilty thing  
roof fretted with golden fire- why, it appeareth no other thing
As one, in suff'ring all, that suffers nothing;
That carry but half sense. Her speech is nothing,
With forms to his conceit? And all for nothing!
Ber. I have seen nothing.
Ham. Nothing.
Did nothing.
Or is it some abuse, and no such thing?  
tell me one thing.
Ham. Ay, sir, but 'while the grass grows'- the proverb is something
More relative than this. The play's the thing
The King is a thing-
Confederate season, else no creature seeing;
neck. He lays him down upon a bank of flowers. She, seeing
Luc. Thoughts black, hands apt, drugs fit, and time agreeing;
What company, at what expense; and finding
I think it was to see my mother's wedding.
Queen. But look where sadly the poor wretch comes reading.
Enter a King and a Queen very lovingly; the Queen embracing
Virtue itself of vice must pardon beg-
That he could nothing do but wish and beg
Until my eyelids will no longer wag.
At his head a grass-green turf,
That rots itself in ease on Lethe wharf,
this special observance, that you o'erstep not the modesty of
Than fly to others that we know not of?
or calendar of gentry; for you shall find in him the continent of
speak it profanely), that, neither having the accent of
nor no matter in the phrase that might indict the author of
keep out water a great while; and your water is a sore decayer of
Dost thou hear me, old friend? Can you play 'The Murther of
Ham. Get thee to a nunnery! Why wouldst thou be a breeder of
till doomsday. Go, get thee to Yaughan; fetch me a stoup of
And that I see, in passages of proof,
But with a crafty madness keeps aloof
Clown. A pestilence on him for a mad rogue! 'A pour'd a flagon of
letters for him. Ere we were two days old at sea, a pirate of  
pate full of fine dirt? Will his vouchers vouch him no more of
Sits smiling to my heart; in grace whereof,
fines, his double vouchers, his recoveries. Is this the fine of
Guil. Which dreams indeed are ambition; for the very substance of
his wife, Baptista. You shall see anon. 'Tis a knavish piece of
altitude of a chopine. Pray God your voice, like a piece of
very responsive to the hilts, most delicate carriages, and of
know, to divide him inventorially would dozy th' arithmetic of
Behind the arras I'll convey myself
That to Laertes I forgot myself,
Horatio!- or I do forget myself.
Lives almost by his looks; and for myself,-
How strange or odd soe'er I bear myself
Must render up myself.
Where now it burns, Marcellus and myself,
purpose, confess thyself-
Woo't weep? woo't fight? woo't fast? woo't tear thyself?
Hor. As thou art to thyself.
With fiery quickness. Therefore prepare thyself.
Whose violent property fordoes itself  
Being a thing immortal as itself?  
Laer. Thought and affliction, passion, hell itself,
It sends some precious instance of itself
And oft 'tis seen the wicked prize itself
Given private time to you, and you yourself
Pol. Observe his inclination in yourself.  
Fran. Nay, answer me. Stand and unfold yourself.
I lov'd your father, and we love ourself,
When down her weedy trophies and herself
It is a poison temper'd by himself.
excellence; but to know a man well were to know himself.
The Devil himself.
Ros. How can that be, when you have the voice of the King himself
So much from th' understanding of himself,
Hyperion's curls; the front of Jove himself;
And live the purer with the other half,
little. 'Sblood, there is something in this more than natural, if
sir,- it comes from th' ambassador that was bound for England- if
If it be made of penetrable stuff;
not off.
are shot off.  
Queen. Good Hamlet, cast thy nighted colour off,
Enter Hamlet and Horatio afar off.
A flourish of trumpets, and two pieces go off.
My head should be struck off.
Or to the dreadful summit of the cliff
By his cockle bat and' staff
Of impious stubbornness. 'Tis unmanly grief;
The origin and commencement of his grief
King. Laertes, I must commune with your grief,
Together with all forms, moods, shapes of grief,
Ham. [comes forward] What is he whose grief  
hear? Let them be well us'd; for they are the abstract and brief
Ham. Marry, this is miching malhecho; it means mischief.  
King. No place indeed should murther sanctuarize;
I have a speech of fire, that fain would blaze
Ham. Ay, so, God b' wi' ye!
And you the judges, bear a wary eye.
We shall express our duty in his eye;
Hor. A mote it is to trouble the mind's eye.
As day does to your eye.
Here in the cheer and comfort of our eye,
He swore had neither motion, guard, nor eye,
With an auspicious, and a dropping eye,
Burn out the sense and virtue of mine eye!
No, nor the fruitful river in the eye,
No, not to stay the finding of the axe,
Guil. Faith, her privates we.
O, that that earth which kept the world in awe
After the Danish sword, and thy free awe
As hardy as the Nemean lion's nerve.
For 'tis a question left us yet to prove,
This must be known; which, being kept close, might move
Yet the unshaped use of it doth move
Doubt that the sun doth move;
Queen. The instances that second marriage move
Pol. Mad for thy love?  
Oph. There's rosemary, that's for remembrance. Pray you, love,
From the fair forehead of an innocent love,
Ham. As woman's love.
his love.
Receiv'd his love?
This mad young man. But so much was our love
More grief to hide than hate to utter love.
If thou didst ever thy dear father love-
But never doubt I love.
Oph. My lord, he hath importun'd me with love
Stew'd in corruption, honeying and making love
Could not (with all their quantity of love)
And with no less nobility of love
This is the very ecstasy of love,
As meditation or the thoughts of love,
Are base respects of thrift, but none of love.
There lives within the very flame of love
Whether love lead fortune, or else fortune love.
I do receive your offer'd love like love,
In youth when I did love, did love,
To contract- O- the time for- a- my behove,
Fare you well, my dove!
Anon, as patient as the female dove
Buys out the law; but 'tis not so above.
Hor. I think it lacks of twelve.
Upon the platform, 'twixt eleven and twelve,
I could not but by her. The other motive
Ham. No, good mother. Here's metal more attractive.
Taint not thy mind, nor let thy soul contrive
bad epitaph than their ill report while you live.
Ham. Nay, but to live
And thy commandment all alone shall live
beck than I have thoughts to put them in, imagination to give
They find us touch'd, we will our kingdom give,
those that would make mows at him while my father lived give
pound! Didst perceive?
Which we do tender as we dearly grieve
reckon my groans; but that I love thee best, O most best, believe
Hor. Before my God, I might not this believe
Pol. It shall do well. But yet do I believe
Ham. Into my grave?
And not have strew'd thy grave.
Is now most still, most secret, and most grave,
To outface me with leaping in her grave?
Leaps in the grave.
grave.]
Hor. There needs no ghost, my lord, come from the grave
Why, what an ass am I! This is most brave,
But he's an arrant knave.
Who was in life a foolish peating knave.
this, give these fellows some means to the King. They have
first mouth'd, to be last Swallowed. When he needs what you have
Would step from this to this? Sense sure you have,
Rey. My lord, I have.
And makes us rather bear those ills we have
Queen. What would she have?
Ham. So you must take your husbands.- Begin, murtherer. Pox, leave
Pol. He hath, my lord, wrung from me my slow leave
By the mass, I was about to say something! Where did I leave?
Laer. I pray you give me leave.
I'll board him presently. O, give me leave.
Occasion smiles upon a second leave.
To make them ranker. Forgive me this my virtue;  
Collected from all simples that have virtue
Pol. 'Tis most true;
Hor. As I do live, my honour'd lord, 'tis true;  
King. [aside] O, 'tis too true!
This above all- to thine own self be true,
Enter Prologue.
But break my heart, for I must hold my tongue!
Queen. What have I done that thou dar'st wag thy tongue
Give it an understanding but no tongue.
Look thou character. Give thy thoughts no tongue,
Queen. Come, come, you answer with an idle tongue.
Ham. Go, go, you question with a wicked tongue.
The perfume and suppliance of a minute;
The pith and marrow of our attribute.
For the demand of our neglected tribute.
What might be toward, that this sweaty haste  
Eats not the flats with more impetuous haste
That else leans on th' affair. Pray you make haste.
The rivals of my watch, bid them make haste.
Th' effect of what I wrote?
Or such ambiguous giving out, to note
As Vulcan's stithy. Give him heedful note;
As of a father; for let the world take note
The time is out of joint. O cursed spite
As it doth well appear unto our state,
This bodes some strange eruption to our state.
Th' expectancy and rose of the fair state,
So far from cheer and from your former state.
Of his true state.
The safety and health of this whole state,
Th' imperial jointress to this warlike state,
Fordo it own life. 'Twas of some estate.
Let me be no assistant for a state,  
Set your entreatments at a higher rate
My liege, and madam, to expostulate
King. [aside] It is the poison'd cup; it is too late.
And our affairs from England come too late.  
'Tis told me he hath very oft of late
What, have you given him any hard words of late?
But woe is me! you are so sick of late,
Ros. I think their inhibition comes by the means of the late
If thou art privy to thy country's fate,
There was 'a gaming; there o'ertook in's rouse;
Ham. The King doth wake to-night and takes his rouse,
Pinch wanton on your cheek; call you his mouse;
To tell the secrets of my prison house,
That I have shot my arrow o'er the house
sinners? I am myself indifferent honest, but yet I could accuse
Doth rend the region; so, after Pyrrhus' pause,
That your good beauties be the happy cause
Like John-a-dreams, unpregnant of my cause,  
For this effect defective comes by cause.
Whereon the numbers cannot try the cause,
Of deaths put on by cunning and forc'd cause;
I had my father's signet in my purse,
Sure he that made us with such large discourse,
And with th' encorporal air do hold discourse?
thee where I am. Rosencrantz and Guildenstern hold their course
In obstinate condolement is a course
Oph. Still better, and worse.
When he lay couched in the ominous horse,
And to such wondrous doing brought his horse
Was sick almost to doomsday with eclipse.
Calls virtue hypocrite; takes off the rose
brought, the gentleman willing, and the King hold his purpose,
Is but to whet thy almost blunted purpose.
What to ourselves in passion we propose,
How dangerous is it that this man goes loose!
Or with a little shuffling, you may choose
The passion ending, doth the purpose lose.
And I do doubt the hatch and the disclose
end his part in peace; the clown shall make those laugh whose
shall he suffer not thinking on, with the hobby-horse, whose  
in my imagination it is! My gorge rises at it. Here hung those
Hast ta'en with equal thanks; and blest are those
That it is proof and bulwark against sense.
Else could you not have motion; but sure that sense
Whose wicked deed thy most ingenious sense
As any the most vulgar thing to sense,
sense.
Or but a sickly part of one true sense
As my great power thereof may give thee sense,
Laer. What ceremony else?
Laer. What ceremony else?
Ham. O all you host of heaven! O earth! What else?
As by your safety, wisdom, all things else,
half a year. But, by'r Lady, he must build churches then; or else
true diction of him, his semblable is his mirror, and who else
(As how should it be so? how otherwise?),
be otherwise.
When it prov'd otherwise.?
For who that's but a queen, fair, sober, wise,
Through your dominions for this enterprise,
For food and diet, to some enterprise
Till then sit still, my soul. Foul deeds will rise,
Our purpose may hold there.- But stay, what noise,
Hath given me this. Now gather, and surmise.
Last, and as such containing as all these,
Ham. Good sir, whose powers are these?
Or (not to crack the wind of the poor phrase,
Or by pronouncing of some doubtful phrase,
They clip us drunkards and with swinish phrase
phrase.
But, like the owner of a foul disease,
We heard it all.- My lord, do as you please;
Will not peruse the foils; so that with ease,
Among a mineral of metals base,
Clown. What, art a heathen? How dost thou understand the Scripture?
A violet in the youth of primy nature,
A fault against the dead, a fault to nature,
That grows to seed; things rank and gross in nature
So crimeful and so capital in nature,
Laer. I am satisfied in nature,
Yet so far hath discretion fought with nature
Till the foul crimes done in my days of nature
Making night hideous, and we fools of nature
For use almost can change the stamp of nature,
'twere, the mirror up to nature; to show Virtue her own feature,
Hunts not the trail of policy so sure
Exposing what is mortal and unsure
Have you so slander any moment leisure
Ham. Here's the commission; read it at more leisure.
Ham. I am constant to my purposes; they follow the King's pleasure.
Ros. Without, my lord; guarded, to know your pleasure.
Well may it sort that this portentous figure
You heavenly guards! What would your gracious figure?
And pity 'tis 'tis true. A foolish figure!
The terms of our estate may not endure
Within the centre.
make you at Elsinore?
Near Elsinore.
But what is your affair in Elsinore?
SCENE.- Elsinore.
Elsinore.
Ham. The concernancy, sir? Why do we wrap the gentleman in our more
Makes vow before his uncle never more
And think it pastime. You shortly shall hear more.
Be but to sleep and feed? A beast, no more.
Laer. Think it no more.
Queen. No more!
Queen. O Hamlet, speak no more!
Queen. O, speak to me no more!
eyes. Prithee no more!
No more.
'One fair daughter, and no more,
And from his mouth whose voice will draw on more.
Ham. You cannot, sir, take from me anything that I will more
To keep itself from noyance; but much more
would trace him, his umbrage, nothing more.
Never departed more.
And thus o'ersized with coagulate gore,
Ham. I'll be with you straight. Go a little before.  
O'er whom his very madness, like some ore
Before You visit him, to make inquire
Grop'd I to find out them; had my desire,
It is most retrograde to our desire;
Out of the shot and danger of desire.
For every man hath business and desire,
As if it some impartment did desire
And gins to pale his uneffectual fire.
Ham. What, frighted with false fire?
'Doubt thou the stars are fire;
Let all the battlements their ordnance fire;
To their lord's murther. Roasted in wrath and fire,
Have burst their cerements; why the sepulchre
and sure, dear friends, my thanks are too dear a halfpenny. Were
That he, as 'twere by accident, may here
King. At supper? Where?
Laer. Drown'd! O, where?
To England send him; or confine him where
Where little fears grow great, great love grows there.
Clown. Why, because 'a was mad. 'A shall recover his wits there;
What is the issue of the business there.  
Ber. Who's there.?
Fran. I think I hear them. Stand, ho! Who is there?
O Hamlet, what a falling-off was there,
or, if 'a do not, 'tis no great matter there.
What, is Horatio there ?
It had been so with us, had we been there.
Ham. I would I had been there.
Ham. Do you see nothing there?
Hath in the skirts of Norway, here and there,
That youth and observation copied there,
Of Jove himself; and now reigns here
Hor. 'Tis here!
Ber. 'Tis here!
Hor. Peace! Who comes here?
Is it not monstrous that this player here,
That, as the star moves not but in his sphere,  
And much offence too. Touching this vision here,
Drink off this potion! Is thy union here?
Much heat and him. I'll silence me even here.
But to my mind, though I am native here  
Of each new-hatch'd, unfledg'd comrade. Beware
uncurrent gold, be not crack'd within the ring.- Masters, you are
me mad. I say, we will have no moe marriages. Those that are
freely, or the blank verse shall halt fort. What players are
Hor. [aside] His purse is empty already. All's golden words are
Where it draws blood no cataplasm so rare,
Hor. Half a share.
Plautus too light. For the law of writ and the liberty, these are
by William Shakespeare
To all that fortune, death, and danger dare,
Could not so mope.
For the supply and profit of our hope,
To desperation turn my trust and hope,
An anchor's cheer in prison be my scope,
To business with the King, more than the scope
Ham. I do not well understand that. Will you play upon this pipe?
Let the birds fly, and like the famous ape,
Armed at point exactly, cap-a-pe,
Thou com'st in such a questionable shape
I'll speak to it, though hell itself should gape
be thou as chaste as ice, as pure as snow, thou shalt not escape
To be contracted in one brow of woe,
These but the trappings and the suits of woe.
Laer. O, treble woe
Ham. From top to toe?
I have taken note of it, the age is grown so picked that the toe  
Ham. Nor the soles of her shoe?
That swoopstake you will draw both friend and foe,
For me, with sorrow I embrace my fortune.
I took thee for thy better. Take thy fortune.
The slings and arrows of outrageous fortune
On Mars's armour, forg'd for proof eterne,
Singeing his pate against the burning zone,
To you yourself, to us, to every one.  
And a man's life is no more than to say 'one.'
Would, like the spring that turneth wood to stone,
At his heels a stone.
You are the most immediate to our throne,
From another one?
I will speak daggers to her, but use none.
Other. Why, he had none.
Ham. One.
For nature crescent does not grow alone
To you alone.
And in a postscript here, he says 'alone.'
Attends the boist'rous ruin. Never alone
Now I am alone.  
Your better wisdoms, which have freely gone  
Mar. 'Tis gone!
He is gone, he is gone,
The bell then beating one-
Let shame say what it will. When these are gone,
Even on the pith of life. Where is he gone?
He is dead and gone;
Yet now I must confess, that duty done,
Queen. O me, what hast thou done?
And thou must cure me. Till I know 'tis done,
Shows itself pure. He weeps for what is done.
Ros. Then is the world one.
With sore distraction. What I have done
If there be any good thing to be done,
Make us again count o'er ere love be done!
Priest. No more be done.
Laer. Must there no more be done?
Away! for everything is seal'd and done
ere you had done.
Whiles, like a puff'd and reckless libertine,
Like quills upon the fretful porpentine.
To be your Valentine.
The thin and wholesome blood. So did it mine;
For my part, I do not lie in't, yet it is mine.
Ham. It will be short; the interim is mine,
I have a daughter (have while she is mine),
And I do think- or else this brain of mine
To those of mine!
mine.
I made to her in marriage, and to decline
I'll do't. Dost thou come here to whine?
King. Stay, give me drink. Hamlet, this pearl is thine;
King. Take thy fair hour, Laertes. Time be thine,
And that, I hope, will teach you to imagine-  
Nature is fine in love, and where 'tis fine,
his fines, and the recovery of his recoveries, to have his fine
Receives rebuke from Norway, and, in fine,
tragical-historical, tragical-comical-historical-pastoral; scene  
Have by the very cunning of the scene
You cannot speak of reason to the Dane
Mar. And liegemen to the Dane.
Ham. Here, thou incestuous, murd'rous, damned Dane,
I am more an antique Roman than a Dane.
Queen. Come hither, my dear Hamlet, sit by me.
Will you be rul'd by me?
But sure the bravery of his grief did put me
How all occasions do inform against me
In noise so rude against me?
To do't. Examples gross as earth exhort me.
Ham. Why did you laugh then, when I said 'Man delights not me'?
Queen. Have you forgot me?
King. With all my heart, and it doth much content me
pipe? Call me what instrument you will, though you can fret me,
Ham. Then is doomsday near! But your news is not true. Let me
And do't the speedier that you may direct me
By heaven, I'll make a ghost of him that lets me!-
Ham. She well instructs me.
Blasted with ecstasy. O, woe is me
Ham. Indeed, indeed, sirs. But this troubles me.
Laer. Come, one for me.
King, father, royal Dane. O, answer me?
Queen. What wilt thou do? Thou wilt not murther me?
It is 'Adieu, adieu! Remember me.'  
His access to me.
Stand dumb and speak not to him. This to me
Of his affection to me.
Speak to me.  
Speak to me.
That may to thee do ease, and, race to me,
What thou hast said to me.
Exeunt Rosencrantz and Guildenstern, [with some
Rome-
In the most high and palmy state of Rome,
To hear the process. I'll warrant she'll tax him home;
Her maiden strewments, and the bringing home
Will return'd shall know you are come home.
Ham. But soft! What noise? Who calls on Hamlet? O, here they come.
For in that sleep of death what dreams may come
Ham. He will stay till you come.
But come!
Ghost. My hour is almost come,
Hor. Have after. To what issue wail this come?
Repent what's past; avoid what is to come;
Come.
That, if again this apparition come,
church. Argal, the gallows may do well to thee. To't again, come!
Laer. I am lost in it, my lord. But let him come!
Be as ourself in Denmark. Madam, come.
not to come, it will be now; if it be not now, yet it will come:
For her perfections. But my revenge will come.
Ham. And therefore as a stranger give it welcome.
Ham. You are welcome.
To let this canker of our nature come
I doubt some foul play. Would the night were come!
There with fantastic garlands did she come
Ham. Hillo, ho, ho, boy! Come, bird, come.
This, in obedience, hath my daughter shown me;
If it be so- as so 'tis put on me,
And to the last bended their light on me.
you cannot play upon me.
Would make them capable.- Do not look upon me,
Who is't that can inform me?
King. Come, Hamlet, come, and take this hand from me.
Laer. It well appears. But tell me
Ghost. Mark me.
Ham. In happy time.
But that I know love is begun by time,
To keep my name ungor'd. But till that time
You must not take for fire. From this time
If his chief good and market of his time
Why day is day, night is night, and time is time.
To any pastime?
take longer time.
My pulse as yours doth temperately keep time
Where, as they had deliver'd, both in time,
For who would bear the whips and scorns of time,
So hallow'd and so gracious is the time.
Were nothing but to waste night, day, and time.
All in the morning bedtime,
To punish me with this, and this with me,
I pray you go with me.
Hor. What are they that would speak with me?
I am afeard You make a wanton of me.
Pol. What do you think of me?
Ros. My lord, you once did love me.
you go about to recover the wind of me, as if you would drive me
Which now, to claim my vantage doth invite me.
Can you advise me?
To speak of horrors- he comes before me.
me of such things that it were better my mother had not borne me.  
Queen. O my son, what theme?  
Ham. Why, I will fight with him upon this theme
To reason most absurd, whose common theme
(Things standing thus unknown) shall live behind me!
And they shall hear and judge 'twixt you and me.
kill'd me.
Quoth she, 'Before you tumbled me,
King. The very same.
Our state to be disjoint and out of frame,
image of a murther done in Vienna. Gonzago is the duke's name;
Transports his poisoned shot- may miss our name
That liberal shepherds give a grosser name,
That hath in it no profit but the name.
O good Horatio, what a wounded name
I can no more. The King, the King's to blame.  
By Cock, they are to blame.
Alack, and fie for shame!
Pol. Yet here, Laertes? Aboard, aboard, for shame!
And melt in her own fire. Proclaim no shame  
That for a fantasy and trick of fame
And set a double varnish on the fame
A cutpurse of the empire and the rule,
They shall go far with little.  
Nor what he spake, though it lack'd form a little,
Elsinore. Another room in the Castle.
Elsinore. Another room in the Castle.
A room in the Castle.
Elsinore. A room in the Castle.
Elsinore. A room in the Castle.
Elsinore. A room in the Castle.
Elsinore. A room in the Castle.
Elsinore. A room in the Castle.
Elsinore. hall in the Castle.
Elsinore. A hall in the Castle.
Elsinore. A room of state in the Castle.
Elsinore. A passage in the Castle.
Elsinore. The platform before the Castle.
Elsinore. A platform before the Castle.
So frown'd he once when, in an angry parle,
Bestial oblivion, or some craven scruple
That from a shelf the precious diadem stole
Upon my secure hour thy uncle stole,
Nor will it yield to Norway or the Pole
When yond same star that's westward from the pole
stopping a bunghole?
In equal scale weighing delight and dole,
Ungart'red, and down-gyved to his ankle;
That's an ill phrase, a vile phrase; 'beautified' is a vile
My spirits grow dull, and fain I would beguile
Queen. Bestow this place on us a little while.
Absent thee from felicity awhile,
Ham. I'll play this bout first; set it by awhile.
As to expend your time with us awhile
Hor. Season your admiration for a while
Ber. Sit down awhile,
Depriv'd thee of! Hold off the earth awhile,
King. 'Tis deeply sworn. Sweet, leave me here awhile.
Woo't drink up esill? eat a crocodile?
I had not quoted him. I fear'd he did but trifle
Ham. They are coming to the play. I must be idle.  
Would have mourn'd longer) married with my uncle;  
My uncle?
The heyday in the blood is tame, it's humble,
Black as his purpose, did the night resemble
Hor. Is't possible?
Ham. Is't possible?
Ham. O, horrible! O, horrible! most horrible!
King. Set me the stoups of wine upon that table.
your table!
Be thy intents wicked or charitable,
How weary, stale, flat, and unprofitable
King. As of a man faithful and honourable.
For it is as the air, invulnerable,
'I saw him enter such a house of sale,'
Hor. Nay, very pale.
Ber. How now, Horatio? You tremble and look pale.
Pol. Very like a whale.
Ham. Or like a whale.
Clown. Ay, tell me that, and unyoke.
The need we have to use you did provoke
Clamb'ring to hang, an envious sliver broke,  
King. The doors are broke.
The nights are wholesome, then no planets strike,
Queen. it may be, very like.
That thy rebellion looks so giantlike?
tell you must show fairly outwards) should more appear like
These hands are not more like.
him and my daughter.- My honourable lord, I will most humbly take
Hamlet comes back. What would you undertake
When he himself might his quietus make
article, and his infusion of such dearth and rareness as, to make
And he, repulsed, a short tale to make,
With arms encumb'red thus, or this head-shake,
Hath turn'd itself on me. Lo, here I lie,
Thou know'st 'tis common. All that lives must die,
Horatio. A fellow of infinite jest, of most excellent fancy. He
seems to me a sterile promontory; this most excellent canopy, the
ladyship is nearer to heaven than when I saw you last by the
of our fellowship, by the consonancy of our youth, by the
Ham. That skull had a tongue in it, and could sing once. How the
when I shall (first asking your pardon thereunto) recount the
is but variable service- two dishes, but to one table. That's the
Ham. 'The Mousetrap.' Marry, how? Tropically. This play is the
Clown. Give me leave. Here lies the water; good. Here stands the
Clown. Cannot you tell that? Every fool can tell that. It was the
put another question to thee. If thou answerest me not to the
temperance that may give it smoothness. O, it offends me to the
Ham. Then will I come to my mother by-and-by.- They fool me to the
Clown. What is he that builds stronger than either the mason, the
Ros. Even those you were wont to take such delight in, the
Ham. Do they hold the same estimation they did when I was in the
thou dost ill to say the gallows is built stronger than the
A slave that is not twentieth part the tithe
[The Attendants part them, and they come out of the
and we had the trick to see't. Did these bones cost no more the
action how like an angel! in apprehension how like a god! the
And breath of life, I have no life to breathe
carried away. The Poisoner wooes the Queen with gifts; she
Like Niobe, all tears- why she, even she
King. But where is he?
King. But how hath she
Ham. He did comply with his dug before he suck'd it. Thus has he,
Ber. He.
earth; of earth we make loam; and why of that loam (whereto he
he.
Pol. What said he?
And many such-like as's of great charge,
When the compulsive ardour gives the charge,
Pol. Faith, no, as you may season it in the charge.
Witness this army of such mass and charge,
May sweep to my revenge.
Why, this is hire and salary, not revenge!
Of your dear father's death, is't writ in Your revenge
bellow for revenge.
Laer. Hadst thou thy wits, and didst persuade revenge,
Ham. 'Tis very strange.
This world is not for aye, nor 'tis not strange
Hor. O day and night, but this is wondrous strange!
'Tis strange.
Or quit in answer of the third exchange,
That even our loves should with our fortunes change;
Of the unworthiest siege.
The speech, of vantage. Fare you well, my liege.
Pol. Have I, my lord? Assure you, my good liege,
We may of their encounter frankly judge
And to those thorns that in her bosom lodge
Ham. It would cost you a groaning to take off my edge.
Good gentlemen, give him a further edge
The triumph of his pledge.
King. Arm you, I pray you, to th', speedy voyage;
Enter Fortinbras with his Army over the stage.
Ghost cries under the stage.
Bear Hamlet like a soldier to the stage;
Colleagued with this dream of his advantage,
He hath not fail'd to pester us with message
To have prov'd most royally; and for his passage
When he is fit and seasoned for his passage?  
'Tis too much prov'd, that with devotion's visage
Nor the dejected havior of the visage,
You cannot call it love; for at your age
By heaven, it is as proper to our age
When he is drunk asleep; or in his rage;
Come on! You hear this fellow in the cellarage.
His father's death and our o'erhasty marriage.
With mirth in funeral, and with dirge in marriage,
Stood challenger on mount of all the age
And prey on garbage.
I hop'd thou shouldst have been my Hamlet's wife;
You are the Queen, your husband's brother's wife,
shall see anon how the murtherer gets the love of Gonzago's wife.
If, once a widow, ever I be wife!
Both here and hence pursue me lasting strife,
To grunt and sweat under a weary life,
Unto young Hamlet; for, upon my life,
With, hoo! such bugs and goblins in my life-
Pursued my life.
Or if thou hast uphoarded in thy life
The serpent that did sting thy father's life
Should be as mortal as an old man's life?
Hor. It was, as I have seen it in his life,
yet? Then there's hope a great man's memory may outlive his life
Thrown out his angle for my Proper life,
Upon whose property and most dear life
guilty of his own death shortens not his own life.  
That makes calamity of so long life.
life,
In thee there is not half an hour of life.
To keep those many many bodies safe
Hor. What is it you will see?
T' have seen what I have seen, see what I see!
Queen. Nothing at all; yet all that is I see.
For by the image of my cause I see
And let all sleep, while to my shame I see
An hour of quiet shortly shall we see;
If this did blast in proof. Soft! let me see.
your memory, begin at this line- let me see, let me see:
what part a gentleman would see.
Ham. I could interpret between you and your love, if I could see
Which now, like fruit unripe, sticks on the tree,  
work; but what o' that? Your Majesty, and we that have free
Make mad the guilty and appal the free,
O limed soul, that, struggling to be free,
you not sent for? Is it your own inclining? Is it a free
And crook the pregnant hinges of the knee
Go on. I'll follow thee.
I say, away!- Go on. I'll follow thee.
Ham. Heaven make thee free of it! I follow thee.
But bear me stiffly up. Remember thee?
In this distracted globe. Remember thee?
Mine and my father's death come not upon thee,
Farewell. My blessing season this in thee!
For what advancement may I hope from thee,  
Why seems it so particular with thee?
And you are stay'd for. There- my blessing with thee!
Bear't that th' opposed may beware of thee.
You are welcome, masters; welcome, all.- I am glad to see thee
I do not set my life at a pin's fee;
A ranker rate, should it be sold in fee.
Gives him three thousand crowns in annual fee
He's lov'd of the distracted multitude,
King. Let's follow, Gertrude.  
Why thou art thus incens'd. Let him go, Gertrude.
All from her father's death. O Gertrude, Gertrude,
Pyrrhus at Priam drives, in rage strikes wide;
Fell in the weeping brook. Her clothes spread wide
Guil. We will ourselves provide.
Your Grace has laid the odds o' th' weaker side.
Thereto prick'd on by a most emulate pride,
Ham. Do you not come your tardy son to chide,
And recks not his own rede.
A pickaxe and a spade, a spade,
The lists, and full proportions are all made
wantonness your ignorance. Go to, I'll no more on't! it hath made
Till of this flat a mountain you have made
The instant burst of clamour that she made
[Sings] O, a pit of clay for to be made
O, a Pit of clay for to be made  
And what's in prayer but this twofold force,
It shall as level to your judgment pierce
Ham. I am tame, sir; pronounce.
but now the time gives it proof. I did love you once.
To prick and sting her. Fare thee well at once.
Ham. No, nor mine now. [To Polonius] My lord, you play'd once
Ham. How long is that since?
Importing health and graveness. Two months since
Hor. Now cracks a noble heart. Good night, sweet prince,
Led by a delicate and tender prince,
Each small annexment, petty consequence,
He closes with you in this consequence:
That so his sickness, age, and impotence
Be something scanter of your maiden presence.
pray You Pass with your best violence;
Nor shall you do my ear that violence
To offer it the show of violence;
We'll put on those shall praise your excellence
Ros. Ay, my lord. They stay upon your patience.
Sir, in this audience,
And call the noblest to the audience.
Laer. [aside] And yet it is almost against my conscience.
How smart a lash that speech doth give my conscience!
And with such coz'nage- is't not perfect conscience
Ros. Tell us where 'tis, that we may take it thence
For that which thou hast done,- must send thee hence
That both the world, I give to negligence,
May one be pardon'd and retain th' offence?
But to confront the visage of offence?
defence?
For art and exercise in your defence,
It will be laid to us, whose providence
grieve; the censure of the which one must in your allowance
On such regards of safety and allowance
More honour'd in the breach than the observance.
Unsifted in such perilous circumstance.
King. And can you by no drift of circumstance
One scene of it comes near the circumstance,
You do remember all the circumstance?
Ham. I'll be your foil, Laertes. In mine ignorance
Your leave and favour to return to France;
Her brother is in secret come from France;
My thoughts and wishes bend again toward France
As fits a king's remembrance.
Exeunt marching; after the which a peal of ordnance
And that our drift look through our bad performance.
Even while men's minds are wild, lest more mischance
You that look pale and tremble at this chance,
There falling out at tennis'; or perchance,
O, vengeance!
on the way, and hither are they coming to offer you service.
Hor. Here, sweet lord, at your service.
To exploit now ripe in my device,
Break we our watch up; and by my advice  
Which done, she took the fruits of my advice,
So, by my former lecture and advice,
Offence's gilded hand may shove by justice,
Unbated and envenom'd. The foul practice
A sword unbated, and, in a pass of practice,
But even his mother shall uncharge the practice  
Give every man thine ear, but few thy voice;
On Fortinbras. He has my dying voice.
If thou hast any sound, or use of voice,
Since my dear soul was mistress of her choice
But it reserv'd some quantity of choice
He smote the sledded Polacks on the ice.
Their virtues else- be they as pure as grace,
Would gambol from. Mother, for love of grace,
A double blessing is a double grace;
Fran. Bernardo hath my place.
It will but skin and film the ulcerous place,
As he in his particular act and place
As they fell out by time, by means, and place,
Get you a place.
Plucks off my beard and blows it in my face?
He falls to such perusal of my face
Queen. Come, let me wipe thy face.
Ham. Then saw you not his face?
For I mine eyes will rivet to his face,
I have a voice and precedent of peace
This is th' imposthume of much wealth and peace,
So you will not o'errule me to a peace.
But fill unshaken when they mellow be.
vice to know him. He hath much land, and fertile. Let a beast be
But this eternal blazon must not be
'Swounds, I should take it! for it cannot be
Unto that element; but long it could not be
To fust in us unus'd. Now, whether it be
Queen. If it be,
the fall of a sparrow. If it be now, 'tis not to come', if it be
what is't to leave betimes? Let be.
it is the breathing time of day with me. Let the foils be
A minist'ring angel shall my sister be
Neither a borrower nor a lender be;
Ham. That I can keep your counsel, and not mine own. Besides, to be
Where late the diadem stood, and for a robe,
Let not the royal bed of Denmark be
Till then in patience our proceeding be.
Ham. It was a brute part of him to kill so capital a calf there. Be
Resembles that it was. What it should be,
Be soft as sinews of the new-born babe!
Dramatis Personae
fortunes turn Turk with me-with two Provincial roses on my raz'd
Or that the Everlasting had not fix'd  
Ham. Safely stow'd.
city? Are they so follow'd?
Not shriving time allow'd.
Which may to you, perhaps, seein much unsinew'd,
Laer. He is justly serv'd.
But virtue, as it never will be mov'd,
My father, in his habit as he liv'd!
and aunt-mother are deceiv'd.
It was against your Highness; whereat griev'd,
By desperate appliance are reliev'd,
And gather by him, as he is behav'd,
But even then the morning cock crew loud,
That cannot be; since I am still possess'd
And with them words of so sweet breath compos'd
When that her golden couplets are disclos'd,  
Too oft before their buttons be disclos'd,
King. Part them! They are incens'd.
or if it was, not above once; for the play, I remember, pleas'd  
As had he been incorps'd and demi-natur'd
The youth you breathe of guilty, be assur'd
Taken to wife; nor have we herein barr'd
The ratifiers and props of every word,
Ham. Ay, lady, it was my word.
So, uncle, there you are. Now to my word:
I could a tale unfold whose lightest word
Swear by my sword.
Swear by my sword.
And for that purpose I'll anoint my sword.
And lay your hands again upon my sword.
Ham. Upon my sword.
Ghost. [beneath] Swear by his sword.
Takes prisoner Pyrrhus' ear. For lo! his sword,
But with the whiff and wind of his fell sword  
With less remorse than Pyrrhus' bleeding sword
Striking too short at Greeks. His antique sword,
The courtier's, scholar's, soldier's, eye, tongue, sword,
Ham. O, but she'll keep her word.
Than is my deed to my most painted word.
Oph. You are merry, my lord.
Oph. I shall obey, my lord.
Rey. Ay, my lord,
1. Play. Ay, my lord.
1. Play. Ay, my lord.
Guil. What should we say, my lord?
Hor. Ay, my lord.
Laer. Ay my lord,
Oph. Ay, my lord.
Oph. Ay, my lord.
Pol. I hear him coming. Let's withdraw, my lord.
The woman will be out. Adieu, my lord.
Pol. Honest, my lord?
Ros. I understand you not, my lord.
Hor. Do not, my lord!
Capt. I will do't, my lord.
Hor. They bleed on both sides. How is it, my lord?
Hor. Remember it, my lord!
Guil. I know, no touch of it, my lord.
Hor. It might, my lord.
Guil. What, my lord?
Hor. What's that, my lord?
Laer. What part is that, my lord?
Hor. What news, my lord?
Oph. You are as good as a chorus, my lord.
Oph. What is, my lord?
Oph. What means this, my lord?
Laer. What out of this, my lord?
Oph. Nay 'tis twice two months, my lord.
Queen. How fares my lord?
Hor. These are but wild and whirling words, my lord.
Will You walk out of the air, my lord?
Pol. What is the matter, my lord?
Pol. The actors are come hither, my lord.
Ros. Neither, my lord.
Hor. You will lose this wager, my lord.
King. Thanks, dear my lord.
Ros. We think not so, my lord.
Hor. E'en so, my lord.
Oph. No, my lord.
Mar. Illo, ho, ho, my lord!
Ros. Will't please you go, my lord?
Mar. You shall not go, my lord.
Both [Mar. and Ber.] We do, my lord.
Guil. Prison, my lord?  
Ros. Ho, Guildenstern! Bring in my lord.
Both. Ay, by heaven, my lord.  
Pol. What follows then, my lord?
What does this mean, my lord?
Rey. I will, my lord.
Rey. Ay, very well, my lord.  
Hor. Very well, my lord.
Ham. Very well, my lord.
Rey. Well, my lord.
Pol. Fare you well, my lord.
Hor. Well, my lord.
Rey. I shall, my lord.
Ros. We shall, my lord.
Pol. Not I, my lord.
Mar. Nor I, my lord.
Hor. Propose the oath, my lord.  
Oph. My lord?
Oph. And hath given countenance to his speech, my lord,
Rey. As gaming, my lord.
Oph. I think nothing, my lord.
Guil. A thing, my lord?
Mess. Save Yourself, my lord:
Oph. 'Tis brief, my lord.
Pol. I have, my lord.
Laer. Most humbly do I take my leave, my lord.
Pol. That's very true, my lord.
Hor. Not a jot more, my lord.
Hor. O, where, my lord?
There, my lord.
Queen. Alas, look here, my lord!
Pol. Do you know me, my lord?
Oph. At home, my lord.
Pol. What treasure had he, my lord?
Ros. Take you me for a sponge, my lord?
Hor. There's no offence, my lord.
Ros. Where the dead body is bestow'd, my lord,
Hor. (within) My lord, my lord!
Hor. What if it tempt you toward the flood, my lord,
Rey. Very good, my lord.
Hor. Ay, good my lord.
Hor. Nay, good my lord -
Ros. Good my lord!
Hor. A truant disposition, good my lord.
Oph. Good my lord,
Ros. To what end, my lord?
Both. Arm'd, my lord.
Pol. I mean, the matter that you read, my lord.
read, my lord?
[Exit Lord.]
Ham. Or of a courtier, which could say 'Good morrow, sweet lord!
Guil. In what, my dear lord?
Hor. O, my dear lord!
Ros. My most dear lord!
O'erbears Your offices. The rabble call him lord;
I'll blessing beg of you.- For this same lord,  
Mar. How is't, my noble lord?
Guil. My honour'd lord!
Pol. Th' ambassadors from Norway, my good lord,
Osr. Ay, my good lord.
Rey. But, my good lord-
Mar. My good lord!
Hor. [aside to Hamlet] No, my good lord.
1. Play. What speech, my good lord?
Laer. My dread lord,
Enter a Lord.
Alas, how shall this bloody deed be answer'd?
A sable silver'd.
To feed and clothe thee? Why should the poor be flatter'd?
Guil. Is in his retirement, marvellous distemper'd.  
That I, the son of a dear father murther'd,
Elsinore. A churchyard.
A damn'd defeat was made. Am I a coward?
should be old as I am if, like a crab, you could go backward.  
Ber. Have you had quiet guard?
Guildenstern, and other Lords attendant, with the Guard
Laer. That drop of blood that's calm proclaims me bastard;
King. Follow him at foot; tempt him with speed aboard.
Hoist with his own petar; and 't shall go hard
Oph. He took me by the wrist and held me hard;
Brief let me be. Sleeping within my orchard,
'Tis given out that, sleeping in my orchard,
Wherein necessity, of matter beggar'd,
As did that one; and that, in my regard,
His nephew's levies; which to him appear'd
Hath now this dread and black complexion smear'd  
Our hasty sending. Something have you heard
Never to speak of this that you have heard:
Upon a fearful summons. I have heard
Fie upon't! foh! About, my brain! Hum, I have heard
great showing. Indeed, to speak feelingly of him, he is the card
Who this had seen, with tongue in venom steep'd
Ham. [aside] Wormwood, wormwood!
So, as a painted tyrant, Pyrrhus stood,
O'er which his melancholy sits on brood;
Repast them with my blood.
Excitements of my reason and my blood,
Contagion to this world. Now could I drink hot blood
Were thicker than itself with brother's blood,
Will want true colour- tears perchance for blood.
Hold it a fashion, and a toy in blood;
Would harrow up thy soul, freeze thy young blood,
As stars with trains of fire, and dews of blood,
A savageness in unreclaimed blood,
Pol. That's good! 'Mobled queen' is good.
My brother shall know of it; and so I thank you for your good
Ham. Why, then 'tis none to you; for there is nothing either good
It is not, nor it cannot come to good.
Yea, curb and woo for leave to do him good.
Ham. Good.  
No medicine in the world can do thee good.
Pol. Fore God, my lord, well spoken, with good accent and good
That to the use of actions fair and good
Form of the thing, each word made true and good,
which this ass now o'erreaches; one that would circumvent God,
Laer. Do you see this, O God?
Ham. O God!
His canon 'gainst self-slaughter! O God! God!
Ham. For if the sun breed maggots in a dead dog, being a god  
Laer. Alas, then she is drown'd?
Queen. Drown'd, drown'd.
Your party in converse, him you would sound,
Ham. Upon what ground?
Hor. Friends to this ground.
Ham. Hic et ubique? Then we'll shift our ground.
Millions of acres on us, till our ground,
We go to gain a little patch of ground
choose but weep to think they would lay him i' th' cold ground.
It waves you to a more removed ground.
Neptune's salt wash and Tellus' orbed ground,
King. Full thirty times hath Phoebus' cart gone round
Laer. Upon my life, Lamound.
But better look'd into, he truly found
He rais'd a sigh so piteous and profound
He tells me, my dear Gertrude, he hath found
As it hath us'd to do- that I have found  
And, like a man to double business bound,
Ros. The single and peculiar life is bound
That father lost, lost his, and the survivor bound
And with his head over his shoulder turn'd
Are joyfully return'd.
King. To thine own peace. If he be now return'd
Was gaged by our king; which had return'd
Wherein we saw thee quietly inurn'd,
Capt. Yes, it is already garrison'd.
Never to rise again. Thy mother's poison'd.
That, from her working, all his visage wann'd,
And so am I reveng'd. That would be scann'd.
Be thou a spirit of health or goblin damn'd,
To quit him with this arm? And is't not to be damn'd
And for his death no wind
Too slightly timber'd for so loud a wind,
The flash and outbreak of a fiery mind,
lungs are tickle o' th' sere; and the lady shall say her mind
Take these again; for to the noble mind
With all the strength and armour of the mind
mind.
To hear him so inclin'd.
That thus hath cozen'd you at hoodman-blind?
Honour'd, belov'd, and haply one as kind
Rich gifts wax poor when givers prove unkind.  
Ham. [aside] A little more than kin, and less than kind!
I must be cruel, only to be kind;
Thus bad begins, and worse remains behind.
And thou shalt live in this fair world behind,
If circumstances lead me, I will find
That have a father klll'd, a mother stain'd,
And carriage of the article design'd,
King. Love? his affections do not that way tend;  
Pol. The time invites you. Go, your servants tend.
Queen. Mad as the sea and wind when both contend
And hitherto doth love on fortune tend,
As make your bouts more violent to that end-
I, his sole son, do this same villain send
Perpend.
And each particular hair to stand an end
your friend.
And You must put me in your heart for friend,
For loan oft loses both itself and friend,
For who not needs shall never lack a friend,
No more; and by a sleep to say we end
THE END
end.
died. They say he made a good end.
full of most excellent differences, of very soft society and
Hor. Do, if it will not stand.
Conjures the wand'ring stars, and makes them stand
I dare damnation. To this point I stand,
only emperor for diet. We fat all creatures else to fat us, and
pick'd out of ten thousand.
Other. The gallows-maker; for that frame outlives a thousand  
Ham. O good Horatio, I'll take the ghost's word for a thousand
rapiers and poniards, with their assigns, as girdle, hangers, and
crown, kisses it, pours poison in the sleeper's ears, and
them) that many wearing rapiers are afraid of goosequills and
Ham. A goodly one; in which there are many confines, wards, and
Ham. Why, anything- but to th' purpose. You were sent for; and
Rey. At 'closes in the consequence,' at 'friend or so,' and  
speech of some dozen or sixteen lines which I would set down and
(O royal knavery!), an exact command,
Put your dread pleasures more into command
An eye like Mars, to threaten and command;
Oph. No, my good lord; but, as you did command,
Th' important acting of your dread command?
You, good Cornelius, and you, Voltemand,
Osr. Young Fortinbras, with conquest come from Poland,
Capt. Against some part of Poland.  
have tribute of me; the adventurous knight shall use his foil and
The present death of Hamlet. Do it, England;  
Ham. For England?
Ham. I see a cherub that sees them. But come, for England!
For England.
one flesh; and so, my mother. Come, for England!
into England.
Ham. Ay, marry, why was be sent into England?
Thus set it down: he shall with speed to England
You from the Polack wars, and you from England,
I cannot live to hear the news from England,
Hor. It must be shortly known to him from England
Of this post-haste and romage in the land.
And hath shipped me intil the land,
So nightly toils the subject of the land,
Ham. It is not very strange; for my uncle is King of Denmark, and
The treacherous instrument is in thy hand,
Which let thy wisdom fear. Hold off thy hand!
Thus was I, sleeping, by a brother's hand
If by direct or by collateral hand
a kind of yesty collection, which carries them through and
But to recover of us, by strong hand
The corse they follow did with desp'rate hand
Laer. Know you the hand?
And both neglect. What if this cursed hand
Hor. You might have rhym'd.
But let this same be presently perform'd,
Laer. My lord, I will be rul'd;
would play upon me; you would seem to know my stops; you would
That treason can but peep to what it would,
As 'Well, well, we know,' or 'We could, an if we would,'
No hat upon his head, his stockings foul'd,
Ham. The phrase would be more germane to the matter if we could
In the corrupted currents of this world
Seem to me all the uses of this world!
And let me speak to the yet unknowing world
Laer. My will, not all the world!
I do not know from what part of the world
world.
And you, my sinews, grow not instant old,
An understanding simple and unschool'd;
Ros. Happily he's the second time come to them; for they say an old
Should have a back or second, that might hold
Ham. [aside] Nay then, I have an eye of you.- If you love me, hold
To what I shall unfold.
A little month, or ere those shoes were old
Ham. The air bites shrewdly; it is very cold.
Fran. For this relief much thanks. 'Tis bitter cold,
To mine own room again; making so bold  
Within his truncheon's length; whilst they distill'd  
Queen. To draw apart the body he hath kill'd;
To tell him his commandment is fulfill'd
In his true nature, and we ourselves compell'd,
Nor sense to ecstacy was ne'er so thrall'd
But if't be he I mean, he's very wild
man is twice a child.
Unhous'led, disappointed, unanel'd,
Hor. How was this seal'd?
Hor. (reads the letter) 'Horatio, when thou shalt have overlook'd
So lust, though to a radiant angel link'd,
Goes slow and stately by them. Thrice he walk'd
Ham. Why, e'en so! and now my Lady Worm's, chapless, and knock'd
Oph. 'Tis in my memory lock'd,
Ham. O villany! Ho! let the door be lock'd.
Now is be total gules, horridly trick'd
Which happily foreknowing may avoid,
In dreadful secrecy impart they did,
Oph. My honour'd lord, you know right well you did,
Hor. My lord, I did;
Come short of what he did.
Are burnt and purg'd away. But that I am forbid  
And, as you said, and wisely was it said,
You need not tell us what Lord Hamlet said.
set down with as much modesty as cunning. I remember one said
Friends both, go join you with some further aid.
I thought thy bride-bed to have deck'd, sweet maid,
Let in the maid, that out a maid
And you must needs have heard, how I am punish'd
And where 'tis so, th' offender's scourge is weigh'd,
Ham. Then are our beggars bodies, and our monarchs and outstretch'd
Mar. My lord, upon the platform where we watch'd.
Of life, of crown, of queen, at once dispatch'd;
Repugnant to command. Unequal match'd,
Priest. Her obsequies have been as far enlarg'd
Hamlet is of the faction that is wrong'd;
'Tis heavy with him; and am I then reveng'd,
Let come what comes; only I'll be reveng'd
Whom I will trust as I will adders fang'd,
She should in ground unsanctified have lodg'd
Whose spirit, with divine ambition puff'd,
You promis'd me to wed.'
by them, in his meed he's unfellowed.
So think thou wilt no second husband wed;
Oph. I was the more deceived.
Or like a creature native and indued
Laer. A document in madness! Thoughts and remembrance fitted.
The memory be green, and that it us befitted
Which now goes too free-footed.
Oph. O my lord, my lord, I have been so affrighted!
Thou mixture rank, of midnight weeds collected,
With Hecate's ban thrice blasted, thrice infected,
Ros. He does confess he feels himself distracted,
Enter Ophelia distracted.
Ham. I heard thee speak me a speech once, but it was never acted;
journeymen had made men, and not made them well, they imitated
Have heaven and earth together demonstrated
Wherein our Saviour's birth is celebrated,
When he th' ambitious Norway combated.
That, on the supervise, no leisure bated,
hath borne me on his back a thousand tunes. And now how abhorred
Ham. Pale or red?
Hor. While one with moderate haste might tell a hundred.
Since yet thy cicatrice looks raw and red
Be all my sins rememb'red.
Whose blood and judgment are so well commingled
King. 'Tis Hamlet's character. 'Naked!'
Her mood will needs be pitied.
Those friends thou hast, and their adoption tried,
Is death of fathers, and who still hath cried,
I did repel his letters and denied
To the unsatisfied.
'To the celestial, and my soul's idol, the most beautified
For look you how cheerfully my mother looks, and my father died
enough, and likelihood to lead it; as thus: Alexander died,
Of his own just remove; the people muddied,
And I, of ladies most deject and wretched,
And duller shouldst thou be than the fat weed  
Guil. Nay, good my lord, this courtesy is not of the right breed.
King. She sounds to see them bleed.
To keep it from divulging, let it feed
Could you on this fair mountain leave to feed,
King. O heavy deed!
That he cried out 'twould be a sight indeed
Queen. So he does indeed.
You say right, sir; a Monday morning; twas so indeed.
To show yourself your father's son in deed
A combination and a form indeed
Pol. By th' mass, and 'tis like a camel indeed.
Laer. I know him well. He is the broach indeed
Stick fiery off indeed.
Confound the ignorant, and amaze indeed
Ham. Indeed, upon my sword, indeed.
Osr. It is indifferent cold, my lord, indeed.
Where truth is hid, though it were hid indeed
But we will ship him hence; and this vile deed
As false as dicers' oaths. O, such a deed
But wilt thou bear me how I did proceed?
Guil. Nor do we find him forward to be sounded,
Pol. This business is well ended.
Mar. It is offended.
Ham. Mother, you have my father much offended.
Queen. Hamlet, thou hast thy father much offended.
To be commanded.
If his fitness speaks, mine is ready; now or whensoever, provided
An thou hadst not come to my bed.'
Or in th' incestuous pleasure of his bed;
Good night- but go not to my uncle's bed.
I'll call upon you ere you go to bed
Ros. She desires to speak with you in her closet ere you go to bed.
Let the bloat King tempt you again to bed;
When second husband kisses me in bed.
Will sate itself in a celestial bed
Go to thy deathbed;
In the rank sweat of an enseamed bed,
'Gainst Fortune's state would treason have pronounc'd.
Lord Hamlet, with his doublet all unbrac'd,
And therefore must his choice be circumscrib'd
And then, they say, no spirit dare stir abroad,
What is't but to be nothing else but mad?
I will be brief. Your noble son is mad.
Queen. Alas, he's mad!
Pol. That hath made him mad.
Ham. How came he mad?
But look, the morn, in russet mantle clad,
And at our more consider'd time we'll read,  
He took my father grossly, full of bread,
With all my imperfections on my head.
Which was declining on the milky head
With bisson rheum; a clout upon that head
Than Young Laertes, in a riotous head,
Hor. This lapwing runs away with the shell on his head.  
T' o'ertop old Pelion or the skyish head
The source of this our watch, and the chief head
bonnet to his right use. 'Tis for the head.
Fall ten times treble on that cursed head
Ham. [draws] How now? a rat? Dead for a ducat, dead!
Ber. In the same figure, like the King that's dead.  
No, no, he is dead;  
But die thy thoughts when thy first lord is dead.
Clown. One that was a woman, sir; but, rest her soul, she's dead.
But let it be. Horatio, I am dead;
King. Dead.
That Rosencrantz and Guildenstern are dead.
We should profane the service of the dead
Now pile your dust upon the quick and dead
A second time I kill my husband dead
The graves stood tenantless, and the sheeted dead
Ham. No, by this bad.  
Pol. And let him ply his music.
lowest note to the top of my compass; and there is much music,  
Come, some music!
Laer. Why, as a woodcock to mine own springe, Osric.
'In her excellent white bosom, these, &c.'
To sleep- perchance to dream: ay, there's the rub!
(for the most part) are capable of nothing but inexplicable dumb
Or given my heart a winking, mute and dumb,
Would from a paddock, from a bat, a gib
And fall a-cursing like a very drab,
Ham. We'll ha't to-morrow night. You could, for a need, study a
whirlwind of your passion, you must acquire and beget a
to me than a foul and pestilent congregation of vapours. What a
anything we see. We'll have a speech straight. Come, give us a
Ham. [aside to Horatio] Thy state is the more gracious; for 'tis a
Ham. In the secret parts of Fortune? O! most true! she is a
Other. Who builds stronger than a mason, a shipwright, or a
holds it no sin to tarre them to controversy. There was, for a
obligation of our ever-preserved love, and by what more dear a
Other. Will you ha' the truth an't? If this had not been a
speak. 'Sblood, do you think I am easier to be play'd on than a
King. Pretty Ophelia!
Queen. How now, Ophelia?
Sprung from neglected love.- How now, Ophelia?
Than may be given you. In few, Ophelia,
Queen. Nay, but Ophelia-
Affront Ophelia.  
Dear maid, kind sister, sweet Ophelia!
Laer. Too much of water hast thou, poor Ophelia,
In hugger-mugger to inter him; Poor Ophelia
Ham. What, the fair Ophelia?
Enter Ophelia.
Enter Ophelia.  
Enter Laertes and Ophelia.
Ophelia,'-
As deep as to the lungs? Who does me this, ha?
more, ha?
Ham. O God, I could be bounded in a nutshell and count myself a
purging thick amber and plum-tree gum; and that they have a
chronicles of the time. After your death you were better have a
Ham. So long? Nay then, let the devil wear black, for I'll have a
That looks so many fadoms to the sea
That beetles o'er his base into the sea,
of his action of battery? Hum! This fellow might be in's time a
For Hecuba!
Hecuba.
What's Hecuba to him, or he to Hecuba,
